CIK: 1323885
Company Name: ATRICURE INC 
Form Type : 10-K
Filing Date: 2022-02-17
Accession Number: 0001323885-22-000011


ITEM 1 BUSINESS Overview We are a leading innovator in treatments for atrial fibrillation (Afib), left atrial appendage (LAA) management and post operative pain. According to the American Heart Association, Afib affects 1 2% of the population in the United States. It is the most common cardiac arrhythmia, or irregular heartbeat, encountered in clinical practice and results in high utilization of healthcare services by Afib patients. Symptoms of Afib may include heart palpitations, dizziness, fatigue and shortness of breath, and these symptoms may be debilitating and life threatening in some cases. When a patient is in Afib, abnormal electrical impulses cause the atria, or upper chambers of the heart, to fibrillate, or beat rapidly, irregularly and in an uncoordinated fashion. As a result, blood in the atria may be in stasis, increasing the risk that a blood clot will form and cause a stroke or other serious complications. In patients with Afib, a significant percentage of those clots can form inside of the LAA. Patients often progress from being in Afib intermittently (paroxysmal) to being in Afib continuously. The continuous Afib patient population includes persistent Afib, which lasts seven days to 1 year, and long standing persistent Afib, which lasts longer than 1 year. Afib often occurs in conjunction with other cardiovascular diseases, including hypertension, congestive heart failure, left ventricular dysfunction, coronary artery disease and valvular disease. Our ablation and left atrial appendage management (LAAM) products are used by physicians during both open heart and minimally invasive procedures. In open heart procedures, the physician is performing heart surgery for other conditions, and our products are used in conjunction with ( concomitant to) such a procedure. Minimally invasive procedures are performed on a standal1 basis, and often include multi disciplinary or hybrid approaches, combining both surgical procedures using AtriCure ablation and LAAM products and catheter ablation. Recovery from cardiothoracic and thoracic surgery can be complicated and painful. Many surgeons use multi modal pain management strategies that include global and local pain management techniques or oral delivery of opioid and non opioid pain medications. In an effort to improve patient recovery for those undergoing Afib surgery, we pursued an analgesia indication for our cryo ablation devices in 2015. Upon seeing the impact on patients and potential applications in a wide variety of surgical procedures, we developed our cryoICE cryoSPHERE probe for pain management (Cryo Nerve Block). Our pain management solutions are used by physicians to freeze nerves during cardiothoracic or thoracic surgical procedures. This technique provides a long lasting analgesic, allowing the patient's body to heal after surgery while the nerves regenerate and sensation is regained. We believe that we are currently the market leader in the surgical treatment of Afib. Our Isolator Synergy Ablation System is approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration (FDA) for the treatment of persistent and long standing persistent Afib concomitant to other open heart surgical procedures. The EPi Sense system is approved by FDA to treat patients with long standing persistent Afib. All of our other ablation devices are cleared for sale in the United States under FDA 510(k) clearances, including our other radio frequency (RF) and cryoablation products, which are indicated for the ablation of cardiac tissue and or the treatment of cardiac arrhythmias. In addition, certain of our cryoablation probes are cleared for managing pain by temporarily ablating peripheral nerves, or Cryo Nerve Block therapy. Further, certain cryoablation probes are approved for the ablation of the intercostal nerves to temporarily block pain in adolescents aged 12 or older. Our AtriClip LAA Exclusion System products are 510(k) cleared with an indication for the exclusion of the LAA, performed under direct visualization and in conjunction with other cardiac surgical procedures. Direct visualization, in this context, requires that the surgeon is able to see the heart directly, with or without assistance from a camera, endoscope or other appropriate viewing technologies. In July 2021, we received 510(k) clearance for the new ENCOMPASS clamp to ablate cardiac tissue during surgery. The LARIAT system is cleared under the 510(k) process for soft tissue ligation. Several of our products are currently being studied to expand labeling claims or to support indications specifically for the treatment of Afib. Our Isolator Synergy clamps, Isolator Synergy pens, Coolrail linear pen, cryoablation devices, cryoSPHERE probe, certain products of the AtriClip LAA Exclusion System, COBRA Fusion Ablation System, the EPi Sense system and LARIAT Suture Delivery Device bear the CE mark and may be commercially distributed throughout the member states of the European Union and other countries that comply with or mirror the Medical Device Directive. Our Isolator Synergy clamps, Isolator Synergy pens, Coolrail linear pen, cryoablation devices and certain products of the AtriClip LAA Exclusion System are available in select Asia Pacific countries. We anticipate that substantially all of our revenue for the foreseeable future will relate to products we currently sell or are in the process of developing. 2 Table of Contents We sell our products to medical centers through our direct sales force in the United States and in certain international markets, such as Germany, France, the United Kingdom and the Benelux region. We also sell our products to distributors who in turn sell our products to medical centers in other international markets. Our business is primarily transacted in U.S. Dollars with the exception of transactions with our European and United Kingdom customers, which are transacted primarily in the Euro or the British Pound. Market Overview Afib is the most commonly diagnosed sustained cardiac arrhythmia with approximately 12 million diagnoses annually in the United States, and affects approximately 33 million people worldwide. It is estimated that the incidence of Afib doubles with each decade of an adult life. At age 40, remaining lifetime risk for Afib is 26% for men and 23% for women. Afib is an under diagnosed condition due in large part to the fact that patients with Afib often have mild or no symptoms, and their Afib is often only diagnosed when they seek treatment for an associated condition, such as a structural heart disease or stroke. We believe that increasing awareness of Afib and improved diagnostic screening will result in an increased number of patients diagnosed with Afib over time. Also, since the prevalence of Afib increases with age, there will likely be an increase in the number of diagnosed Afib patients in the United States as the population ages. We believe that these trends in the United States also apply globally. Afib is a condition that doctors often find difficult to treat and, historically, there has been no widely accepted long term cure for Afib. This difficulty is exacerbated with more serious forms of Afib, or persistent and long standing persistent Afib. Over the past 2 decades, technology advancements have made surgical ablation more effective, repeatable and available to cardiac surgeons and electrophysiologists around the world. Societal guideline changes from the Society of Thoracic Surgeons (STS), Heart Rhythm Society (HRS) and American Association of Thoracic Surgery (AATS) now have Class I recommendations for surgical ablation, meaning that it is a recommended treatment, no longer just reasonable , for patients who have structural heart disease and Afib. In addition, guidelines for the treatment of more serious forms of Afib for patients without structural heart disease have also been introduced in the past several years. These societal guidelines are reflective of the scientific evidence suggesting that surgical and hybrid ablation is safe and effective for patients who have Afib. Of the patients undergoing open heart surgery globally on an annual basis, we estimate that over 250,000 are potential candidates for surgical ablation using our products. Today, we estimate that approximately 25% to 35% of those candidates are being treated, but we believe many are not treated properly or fully. Of the population diagnosed with Afib, a large percentage of patients are symptomatic and do not respond to pharmacological therapy. In addition, Afib is thought to be responsible for approximately 15% to 20% of the estimated 800,000 strokes that occur annually in the United States. According to the American Heart Association, the risk of stroke is five times higher in people with Afib. Studies have also suggested that 90% of clots that cause strokes in patients who have Afib originate from within the LAA. Recently, a very large independent international randomized trial, Left Atrial Appendage Occlusion Study (LAAOS) III, demonstrated a significant reduction in strokes when the LAA was managed during cardiac surgery. Afib accounts for billions of dollars in hospitalization related and office visit costs in the United States each year. Indirect costs, such as the management of Afib related strokes, are believed to be significant. Because of the risk of stroke and the significant cost burden on the healthcare system, more and more surgeons are routinely addressing the LAA, both in patients who have Afib, but also in those who do not have Afib but may be at increased risk of developing the disease in the future. We believe that our AtriClip system is safer, more effective and easier to use than other products and techniques for excluding the LAA during cardiac surgery. Therefore, we believe that the market for the AtriClip system represents a significant growth opportunity. Many Afib patients seek relief solely from the symptoms of their Afib, including palpitations, breathlessness and drowsiness, without underlying structural heart disease. These patients are typically treated by an electrophysiologist using catheter ablation. Catheter ablation is considered a percutaneous procedure that does not require the opening of the chest and involves catheters inserted through a small puncture in the groin. It is estimated that after failing pharmacological therapy, 150,000 200,000 Afib patients are treated by catheter ablation every year in the U.S., a number that is expected to grow 10 15% annually. While the majority of paroxysmal Afib patients treated by catheter ablation tend to experience freedom from Afib, less than a third of long standing persistent Afib patients treated by catheter ablation become free of Afib. Recent randomized, prospective, multi center data shows that these long standing persistent Afib patients can experience double the success rate by adding an ablation on the outside surface of the heart using AtriCure EPi Sense ablation system. Thus, we believe the EPi Sense ablation system used as a minimally invasive or Hybrid AF TM therapy represents a significant growth opportunity for the Company. 3 Table of Contents Additionally, cardiothoracic and thoracic surgery involving an incision through the ribcage, typically referred to as thoracotomy access, can often times result in significant post operative pain and longer hospital recovery times as patients refrain from mobilizing their chest near the incision site. Most surgeons will employ a multi modal pain management protocol that includes global and local pain management techniques, including epidural delivery of medication directly around the spinal cord, intravenous or oral delivery of opioid and non opioid pain medications. More focused, local techniques include syringe injections between vertebrates and Cryo Nerve Block, the use of cryo energy to temporarily ablate peripheral nerves. Cryo Nerve Block can be delivered using our cryoICE cryoSPHERE probe, which is specifically designed for Cryo Nerve Block, as well as our cryoICE CRYO2 probe, 1 of the same probes used to treat cardiac arrhythmias. Depending on the degree of invasiveness, physicians and their nursing staff will take advantage of multiple modes of pain management. It is estimated that each year roughly 140,000 cardiac and thoracic procedures are performed in the United States through thoracotomy access. Hospital recovery times can vary from 2 to eight days depending on the procedure, operative complications associated with the procedure, pain management protocol and other factors. In recent years, opioids have come under heavy scrutiny due to their potential for long term dependency, overdose and possible death. The Center for Disease Control has reported over 49,000 deaths involving opioids in the United States in a single year, and both federal and local governments in the United States have proposed and implemented new regulations to curb the opioid overdose epidemic. It is also estimated that 1 in seven cardiothoracic surgical patients develops an unhealthy post procedural addiction to prescription narcotics, making alternative, non opioid pain management modalities, such as Cryo Nerve Block, increasingly important. AtriCure Solutions and Products Our products enable cardiothoracic surgeons to mimic all or portions of the cut and sew Maze procedure with faster, less invasive and less technically challenging approaches. We have completed, and continue to invest in, clinical studies for the use of our ablation and left atrial appendage management products to treat Afib. Leading cardiothoracic surgeons and electrophysiologists, including those who serve or who have served as consultants to us, have published results of preclinical and clinical studies utilizing our devices. The results of these studies have assessed efficacy, ease of use and safety endpoints. Products for cardiac tissue ablation include those that heat tissue using radio frequency (RF) energy to create the tissue effects or those that cool tissue using cryo thermal heat transfer to create the tissue effects. Our ablation products are part of platforms each consisting of disposable hand pieces which connect to compact RF power generation sources or the cryoICE BOX generator. We generally place this equipment with our direct customers and sell to our distributors. Products for open and minimally invasive ablation Isolator Synergy Clamps . Our Isolator Synergy System historically represented our primary product line and currently generates the majority of our ablation related revenue. All of our clamps are single use disposable RF products with jaws that close in a parallel fashion. We sell multiple configurations of our Isolator Synergy clamps with the primary difference being the form of the clamping jaws. The parallel closure compresses tissue and evacuates the blood and fluids from the energy pathway in order to make the ablation more effective. The Isolator Synergy System is currently being evaluated under the DEEP AF IDE pivotal trial and was previously studied under the ABLATE clinical trial supporting a pre market approval (PMA) in 2011 Multifunctional Pens and Linear Ablation Devices . These devices are single use disposable RF products that come in multiple configurations which have different contact lengths. The MAX Pen devices enable surgeons to evaluate cardiac arrhythmias, perform temporary cardiac pacing, sensing and stimulation and ablate cardiac tissue with the same device. Surgeons are able to readily toggle back and forth between these functions. The Coolrail device enables the user to make longer linear lines of ablation. Surgeons generally use 1 or more of our pen and linear devices in combination with Isolator Synergy clamps. Products for open ablation cryoICE Cryoablation System . The cryoICE cryoablation system is used in open ablation procedures and consists of the cryoICE BOX generator along with a single use disposable probe. The primary differences between these cryoablation probes is the form of the distal end. The cryoICE devices enables the user to make linear ablations of varied lengths. Surgeons may utilize the cryoICE devices in combination with Isolator Synergy clamps or independently. The ICE AFIB clinical trial is studying the safety and efficacy 4 Table of Contents of the cryoICE system for persistent and long standing persistent Afib treatment during concomitant on pump cardiac surgery. The cryoSPHERE probe and certain cryoICE devices are used to apply cryo energy to targeted intercostal peripheral nerves in the ribcage in order to provide temporary pain relief. This technique, called Cryo Nerve Block, is applied intraoperatively by cardiothoracic or thoracic surgeons and results in temporary pain relief for up to 90 days after the procedure. Sensation typically returns to the affected region of the chest after this period. Studies are ongoing to characterize the effects of Cryo Nerve Block and further refine the procedure. Products for minimally invasive ablation EPi Sense Guided Coagulation System with VisiTrax Technology . The EPi Sense Guided Coagulation System with VisiTrax technology utilizes monopolar RF energy for the coagulation of tissue. The EPi Sense device is a single use disposable which is also capable of intraoperative cardiac signal sensing and recording when connected to an external recording device. In April 2021, we announced the PMA approval of the EPi Sense System for treatment of symptomatic, drug refractory, long standing persistent atrial fibrillation, when augmented with an endocardial ablation catheter. The Convergent procedure, or Hybrid AF Therapy, is the only FDA approved minimally invasive procedure to treat patients with long standing persistent Afib. Products for appendage management AtriClip System . The AtriClip System includes an implantable device (AtriClip) coupled to a single use disposable applier. The AtriClip is designed to exclude the left atrial appendage by mechanically clamping the appendage from the outside of the heart, eliminating blood flow between the left atrial appendage and the atrium while avoiding contact with circulating blood. We believe that the AtriClip system is potentially safer, more effective and easier to use than other available products and techniques for permanently excluding the left atrial appendage. These benefits compared to other techniques include permanent exclusion and electrical isolation of the appendage. The AtriClip device comes in a variety of lengths allowing the user to select a configuration specific to the patient and in 2 geometries (a rectangular configuration which encircles the targeted tissue and V shape which allows lateral access for improved usability). The appliers come in multiple forms tailored to specific procedural needs and with different deployment mechanisms. The AtriClip System includes various combinations of AtriClips and appliers. LARIAT System . The LARIAT System is a suture based solution for soft tissue closure and is compatible with a wide range of anatomical shapes. The LARIAT System includes a suture loop coupled to a single use disposable applier. The loop is designed to exclude the left atrial appendage by mechanically cinching the appendage from the outside of the heart, eliminating blood flow between the left atrial appendage and the atrium while avoiding contact with circulating blood. The LARIAT System is currently being evaluated under the aMAZE IDE clinical trial. In addition to the above product lines we also sell enabling technologies including our Lumitip dissectors, Glidepath guides for placement of our clamps, Subtle Cannula to support access for our EPi Sense catheters and a line of reusable cardiac surgery (valve) instruments. The Lumitip dissector is used by surgeons to separate tissues to provide access to key anatomical structures that are targeted for ablation. Cardiac surgery instruments are used during certain surgical procedures for repair or replacement of heart valves. Current Afib Treatment Alternatives Physicians usually begin treating Afib patients with a variety of drugs intended to prevent blood clots, control heart rate or restore the heart to normal sinus rhythm. If a patient Afib cannot be adequately controlled with drug therapy, doctors may perform 1 of several open heart or minimally invasive procedures that vary depending on the severity of the Afib symptoms and whether or not the patient suffers from other forms of heart disease. Often, Afib procedures are performed concomitantly with other cardiac treatments. 5 Table of Contents Alternative treatments to open heart and minimally invasive procedures include Drug Therapy. Pharmaceutical options called anti arrhythmics are available to treat Afib. Depending on a patient severity of the disease and heart condition, physicians typically administer these medications in a hospital setting with continuous monitoring. If the patient goes back into a normal rhythm, the physician will often prescribe a similar anti arrhythmic drug to try to prevent a recurrence of Afib. The effectiveness of drug therapy varies based on the patient population and the drug being prescribed, among other factors. Often, pharmaceuticals to thin the blood (anti coagulants) are prescribed due to the increased risk of stroke for patients who also have Afib. Implantable Devices. Implantable devices, such as defibrillators and pacemakers, can be effective in reducing the symptoms of Afib episodes, but neither device is intended to treat Afib. Patients may continue to experience the adverse effects of Afib as well as some of the symptoms and complications, including dizziness, fatigue, palpitations and stroke because the Afib continues. Catheter Ablation. Catheter ablation is a procedure that is typically performed by an electrophysiologist. The ablations are made from the inside of the heart using a flexible catheter. The heart is reached via a blood vessel, most commonly through the femoral vein. In proportion to the prevalence of Afib, less than 6% of patients receive catheter based Afib treatments each year in the United States. The rate of treatment is even lower for long standing persistent patients in which less than 1% receive catheter based Afib treatments. We do not promote our products specifically for Afib treatment in the United States, except for the Isolator Synergy System and the EPi Sense System. The Isolator Synergy System may be promoted according to its FDA approved indication for patients with persistent and long standing persistent Afib undergoing certain open concomitant procedures, and the EPi Sense System may be promoted according to its FDA approved indication to treat patients with long standing persistent Afib. During elective open heart surgical procedures, such as bypass or valve surgery, cardiothoracic surgeons use our ablation systems to treat patients with a pre existing history of Afib. Surgeons use our products to perform cardiac procedures that may vary depending on the length of time a patient has been diagnosed with Afib and whether the patient Afib is intermittent (paroxysmal), or continuous (non paroxysmal), which is typically further classified as persistent or long standing persistent. Patients who have been diagnosed with Afib for a longer duration and have persistent or long standing persistent forms of Afib generally receive more extensive ablation procedures than patients who have been diagnosed with Afib for a shorter duration or who have paroxysmal Afib. Additionally, during an open concomitant procedure, physicians may use our AtriClip system to exclude the LAA. For those patients with Afib who do not require an open concomitant surgical procedure, surgeons have used our products for minimally invasive or hybrid Afib treatment procedures. These procedures have generally been performed through small incisions without the need to place patients on a heart lung bypass machine. Additionally, during a minimally invasive surgical procedure, physicians may use our AtriClip system to exclude the LAA. Certain physicians are combining various minimally invasive stand al1 epicardial ablation procedures (surgical ablation on the outside of the heart) with endocardial ablation and mapping techniques (catheter ablation from the inside of the heart). The combination of procedures are often referred to as hybrid or multi disciplinary approaches, in that both surgical ablation and catheter ablations are performed. Sometimes, both procedures are performed on the same day or in the same hospital stay, where other times they are performed weeks or months apart. Patient health condition, physician preference, hospital logistics and procedural room availability influence the decision whether to perform hybrid ablations in a single or a staged setting. Physicians are reporting that they are performing these procedures utilizing certain of our products to primarily treat patients who have non paroxysmal forms of Afib. The success of the hybrid procedure for long standing persistent Afib patients was established with the results of the CONVERGE clinical study, the first trial of its kind for the sickest, most difficult to treat patients. We believe that the potential for hybrid Afib procedure adoption is our largest market opportunity. Business Strategy We are passionately focused on reducing the global Afib epidemic and healing the lives of those affected. Our strategy is to expand the treatment options for patients who suffer from Afib or have a high risk of stroke, or who suffer 6 Table of Contents from post operative pain through the continued development of our technologies and expansion of our product offerings, global commercial expansion and clinical science investments. The key elements of our strategy include New Product Innovation. Our product development pipeline includes projects which extend and improve our existing products, as well as research and development projects for new technologies. We plan to continue to develop new and innovative products, including those that allow us to enter new market opportunities or expand our growth in existing markets. Invest in Clinical Science. We continue to invest in landmark clinical trials to validate the long term results of procedures using our products and to support applications to regulatory agencies for expanded indications. We also make clinical research grants to support our product development efforts and expand the body of clinical evidence. Build Physician and Societal Relationships. We have formed consulting relationships with cardiothoracic surgeons, cardiologists, electrophysiologists and thoracic surgeons who work with us to develop and evaluate our products. Additionally, we have formed advisory boards made up of key opinion leaders in multiple specialties to oversee our training and clinical programs. We are building these relationships to provide insight regarding treatment trends, input on future product direction and education for providers involved in treating the disease. We are partnering with leading surgical and cardiology societies to increase the awareness of Afib treatment options. In the past four years, both the Society for Thoracic Surgeons and the Heart Rhythm Society have released new guidelines on the surgical treatment of Afib in both open heart and minimally invasive settings. Provide Training and Education. We have recruited and trained sales and physician education professionals to effectively communicate to our customers the unique features and benefits of our technologies as they relate to their indications for use. Our highly trained professionals meet with physicians at institutions around the world to provide education and technical training on the features, benefits and safe and effective use of our products. With the approval of our Isolator Synergy System, we instituted a program to train providers on the use of the Isolator Synergy System to treat persistent and long standing persistent Afib in patients undergoing open heart surgery. More recently, with the approval of the EPi Sense System, we began programs to train physicians on the use of the EPi Sense Hybrid Coagulation system in a hybrid approach to treating patients with long standing persistent Afib. We believe these training and education programs have increased awareness about the surgical treatment of Afib, and we will continue to make investments to serve our physician customers. As a result of the educational process, we believe that awareness of our technologies is growing and will result in the increased use of our products. Expand Adoption of Our Minimally Invasive Products. We believe that the catalysts for expanded adoption of our minimally invasive products include procedural advancements, such as the hybrid or multi disciplinary procedure, continued innovation and product development and the publication of additional scientific evidence supporting the safety and efficacy of hybrid treatments for persistent and long standing persistent Afib. We believe these efforts will help validate the successful, long term use of our products for patients with persistent and long standing persistent Afib. We believe that ongoing research activities, including prospective clinical trials, new procedural techniques and anticipated presentations and publications will create an increased demand for our minimally invasive products. Evaluate Acquisition Opportunities. We expect to continue to be opportunistic with respect to acquisitions. We evaluate acquisition opportunities on a variety of factors, including investment in clinical science, product innovation and strategic and financial considerations. Clinical Trials In the United States, a significant risk device requires the prior submission of an application for an Investigational Device Exemption (IDE) to FDA for approval before initiating a clinical trial. Clinical trials are required to support a pre market approval (PMA) and are sometimes required for 510(k) clearance. Some trials require a feasibility study followed by a pivotal trial. We are conducting several clinical trials to validate the long term results of procedures using our products and to support applications to regulatory agencies for expanded indications. In addition, we also conduct various studies to gather clinical data regarding our products. Key trials and studies are CONVERGE. We conducted the CONVERGE IDE clinical trial to evaluate the safety and efficacy of the EPi Sense Guided Coagulation System with VisiTrax technology to treat symptomatic persistent and long standing persistent Afib patients who are refractory or intolerant to at least 1 Class I and or III anti arrhythmic drug. In April 2021, we announced the PMA approval of the EPi Sense System for treatment of symptomatic, drug refractory, long standing persistent atrial fibrillation, when augmented with an endocardial ablation catheter. We believe the Convergent procedure, or Hybrid AF 7 Table of Contents therapy, provides the only compelling treatment option for a large and vastly underpenetrated population of Afib patients. The CONVERGE trial demonstrated superiority in the hybrid therapy arm compared to endocardial catheter ablation al1 In patients diagnosed with long standing persistent Afib, the therapy arm showed a 29% absolute difference in efficacy at 12 months (78% relative improvement) and an absolute difference of 35% at 18 months (110% relative improvement). There was also a 33% absolute difference in Afib burden reduction in favor of the Hybrid AF therapy at 12 months, which increased to 37% at 18 months. In April 2021, we also received approval from FDA to conduct the CONVERGE Post Approval Study (PAS). This study allows for 325 patients to be enrolled at up to 50 sites. aMAZE. In connection with our acquisition of SentreHEART in August 2019, we are conducting the aMAZE IDE clinical trial. aMAZE is an FDA approved, prospective, multicenter, randomized controlled trial evaluating the LARIAT system for LAA exclusion adjunctive to pulmonary vein isolation (PVI) catheter ablation for the treatment of persistent and long standing persistent Afib. The objective of the aMAZE IDE trial is to demonstrate that using the LARIAT system for LAA exclusion, plus a PVI catheter ablation, will lead to a reduced incidence of recurrent Afib compared to PVI al1, with a favorable safety profile. The aMAZE IDE trial provides enrollment of up to 600 patients at 65 sites with 1 year follow up. Enrollment was completed in December 2019, and patient follow up for twelve months post PVI catheter ablation required by the study protocol was completed in April 2021 In January 2020, we received approval under a continued access protocol (CAP) for additional patient enrollment of up to 85 patients at existing aMAZE IDE trial sites. In July 2021, the Company was informed that data from the aMAZE clinical trial did not achieve statistical superiority for the primary effectiveness endpoint. Specifically, while the trial met the safety endpoint, the trial did not meet the primary effectiveness endpoint. The Company has stopped enrollment in the aMAZE CAP, and is in the process of further analyzing aMAZE trial data and determining the next steps for the trial, PMA application and any future development activities. ICE AFIB. The ICE AFIB clinical trial is designed to study the safety and efficacy of the cryoICE system for persistent and long standing persistent Afib treatment during concomitant on pump cardiac surgery. The trial provides for enrollment of up to 150 patients at up to 20 sites in the United States. Enrollment began in January 2019 and remains ongoing. DEEP AF Pivotal Study. The DEEP AF IDE pivotal trial evaluates the safety and efficacy of the AtriCure Bipolar System when used in a staged approach where a minimally invasive surgical ablation procedure is first performed. The patient undergoes the endocardial catheter procedure approximately 91 120 days later. The study began in 2014 and was paused during 2016 2017 due to our work to mitigate the risk related to esophageal injury during the procedure. We are committed to patient safety, and we worked collaboratively with FDA and obtained approval to resume enrollment in the trial in 2018 starting with 40 patients. All 40 patients have been enrolled and treated, and in July 2021, we received FDA approval to enroll the full cohort of 220 patients. We are evaluating next steps to resume enrollment. CEASE AF. We are also pursuing a non IDE trial in Europe to compare staged hybrid ablation treatment (minimally invasive surgical ablation procedure is first performed and the patient undergoes the intracardiac catheter procedure approximately 91 180 days later) versus catheter ablation al1 Enrollment began in November 2015. However, we have temporarily suspended enrollment to perform an interim data analysis. Sales, Marketing and Medical Education Our global sales and marketing efforts focus on educating physicians about our unique technologies and their technical benefits. We only promote our products for uses described in their labeling as cleared or approved by the relevant regulatory agencies. We train our sales force on the use of our products to the extent the products are cleared or approved. Our sales team in the United States has approximately 220 employees supporting approximately 57 sales territories. We select our sales personnel based on their expertise, sales experience and reputation in the medical device industry, and their knowledge of cardiac and thoracic surgery procedures and technologies. We market and sell our products in selected countries outside of the United States through a combination of independent distributors and direct sales personnel. Our international sales team includes sales representatives focused on our direct markets, such as Germany, France, the United Kingdom and the Benelux region. We also maintain a ne2rk of distributors in Asia, South America and Canada, as well as certain countries in Europe, who market and sell our products. We continue to evaluate opportunities for further expansion into markets outside of the United States. 8 Table of Contents Competition Our industry is competitive, subject to change and significantly affected by new product introductions and other activities of industry participants. Most of our competitors have greater financial and human resources than we do and have relationships with our target customers, as well as worldwide distribution channels that are more established and developed than ours. Our primary competitor in the cardiac surgery market is Medtronic, plc, who provides similar surgical ablation products to ours that have been adopted by physicians for the treatment of Afib and related conditions. AtriCure has the only medical devices that are approved by FDA for treating long standing persistent Afib the Isolator Synergy Ablation, the first medical device to receive FDA approval for the treatment of persistent Afib in a concomitant setting, and the EPi Sense System, which recently received FDA PMA approval for Hybrid AF Therapy. Several other companies offer intracardiac catheter devices that are commonly used by electrophysiologists to treat Afib. These catheter devices are FDA approved to treat the paroxysmal and persistent forms of Afib, but they are not FDA indicated to treat long standing persistent Afib. AtriCure is monitoring other companies who are conducting clinical trials that may support FDA approval of their devices to treat persistent and long standing persistent Afib, although we are not aware of any ongoing FDA trials by other companies to study ablation of long standing persistent Afib patients. We believe that our products compare favorably against competing products during both open heart and minimally invasive procedures, and that our products improve treatment outcomes for patients with non paroxysmal forms of Afib when combined with intracardiac catheter devices. In addition to the cardiac surgery market, we also consider competition within the post operative pain market. At this time, we are not aware of other companies in the United States who are pursuing cryothermic nerve block therapies for thoracic surgery. There are other companies outside of the United States who market their devices for a similar therapy. To compete effectively, we strive to demonstrate that our products are an attractive alternative or addition to other treatments by differentiating our products on the basis of safety, efficacy, performance, ease of use, reputation, service and impact on healthcare economics. In addition, we invest heavily in training and education to ensure that our customers understand available devices, techniques and approaches for optimal treatment. We have encountered and expect to continue to encounter potential customers who prefer products offered by our competitors. Third Party Reimbursement Payment for patient care in the United States is generally made by third party payors. These payors include private insurers and government insurance programs, such as Medicare and Medicaid. The Medicare program, the largest single payor in the United States, is a federal health benefit program administered by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) and covers certain medical care Item and services for eligible beneficiaries, such as individuals over 65 years old, as well as chronically disabled individuals. Because Medicare beneficiaries comprise a large percentage of the populations for which our products are used, and private insurers may follow the coverage and payment policies for Medicare, Medicare coding, coverage and payment policies for cardiothoracic surgical procedures are significant to our business. Medicare Part A program pays hospitals for inpatient services, such as cardiothoracic surgery, under the Inpatient Prospective Payment System, which provides a predetermined payment based on the patient discharge diagnoses and surgical procedure(s). Discharge diagnoses are grouped into Medicare Severity Diagnosis Related Groupings (MS DRG). There are several cardiac surgery MS DRGs associated with the surgical treatment of Afib, with and without a concomitant open heart procedure. When an ablation device and or LAA exclusion device (LAAM) is used during a concomitant open heart procedure, Medicare hospital reimbursement is based upon the patient primary structural heart surgical procedure. In contrast, sole therapy minimally invasive ablation or surgical LAAM procedures typically are reimbursed under a general cardiac surgery MS DRG. We believe hospital reimbursement rates for sole therapy and concomitant therapy cardiac surgical ablation or LAAM are adequate to cover the cost of our products even when multiple procedures are performed. Physicians are reimbursed for their services separately under the Medicare Part B physician fee schedule. When performing a surgical cardiac ablation with and without a concomitant open heart procedure, surgeons report Current Procedural Terminology (CPT) codes to receive a professional fee payment. Multiple CPT codes may be reported by a physician during a procedure if multiple procedures are performed. There are category 1 CPT codes for both concomitant and standal1 surgical Afib treatment, as well as surgical LAAM. However, some providers utilize unlisted CPT codes to obtain reimbursement in these situations. In addition to the Medicare program, many private payors look to CMS policies as a guideline in setting their coverage policies and payment amounts. The current coverage policies of these private payors may differ from the Medicare program, and payment rates may be higher, lower, or the same as the Medicare program. In some cases, certain 9 Table of Contents private payors adopt negative coverage policies with respect to therapies involving our products. We engage third party reimbursement consultants that provide support to our customers in the event of a coverage denial. Outside of the United States, third party reimbursement varies widely by geography and by the type of therapy in which our devices are used. For example, even though a new medical device may have been approved for commercial distribution, we may find limited demand for the device until coverage and sufficient reimbursement levels have been obtained from governmental and private third party payors. In addition, some private third party payors require that certain procedures or the use of certain products be authorized in advance as a condition of reimbursement. In some countries, cost containment initiatives and health care reforms include initiatives like governmental reviews of reimbursement rate benchmarks, which may significantly reduce reimbursement for procedures using our medical devices or deny coverage for those procedures altogether. We are actively working to pursue market access in certain geographies, which includes applying for new reimbursement for therapies in which our devices are being used or pursuing specific reimbursement for utilization of our devices. Government Regulation Our products are medical devices and are subject to regulation in the United States by FDA and other federal agencies, and by comparable authorities in the European Union (EU) and other countries worldwide. US Regulation FDA regulations govern nearly all of the activities that we perform, or that are performed on our behalf, to ensure that medical products distributed domestically or exported internationally are safe and effective for their intended uses. FDA regulates the total product lifecycle from early design, development and testing, to manufacturing and commercialization activities, as well as post market surveillance and reporting, including corrective actions, removals and recalls. Unless an exemption applies, most medical devices distributed in the United States require either 510(k) clearance or PMA from FDA. 510(k) Clearance Pathway . To obtain 510(k) clearance, we must submit a notification to FDA demonstrating that our proposed device is substantially equivalent to a predicate device, i.e., a previously cleared and legally marketed 510(k) device or a device that was in commercial distribution before May 28, 1976, for which FDA has not yet called for the submission of a PMA. Any modification to a 510(k) cleared device that would constitute a major change in its intended use, or a change in its design or manufacture that could significantly affect the safety or effectiveness of the device, requires a new 510(k) clearance. Premarket Approval Pathway . A PMA must be submitted to FDA if the device cannot be cleared through the 510(k) process and is not otherwise exempt. A PMA must be supported by extensive data, including but not limited to technical, preclinical, clinical, real world data, manufacturing and labeling, to demonstrate the safety and effectiveness of the device for its intended use. A PMA supplement is required for changes affecting the safety or effectiveness of a PMA approved device, including but not limited to new indications for use, a different manufacturing facility, or changes in the manufacturing process, labeling, or design specifications or comp1nts of the device. Clinical Trials . Clinical trials are required to support a PMA and are sometimes required for 510(k) clearance. Clinical trials are subject to extensive recordkeeping and reporting requirements. Our clinical trials must be conducted under the oversight of an Institutional Review Board (IRB) for the relevant clinical trial sites and must comply with FDA regulations, including, but not limited to, those relating to current good clinical practices. We are also required to obtain the written informed consent of patients in form and substance that complies with both FDA requirements and other human subject protection regulations established by FDA. We must conduct our clinical studies in compliance with state and federal privacy laws, including the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (HIPAA). Educational Grants . FDA regulates the promotion of medical devices by manufacturers and prohibits the promotion by manufacturers of uses that are not within the approved or cleared labeling of the device. FDA does not regulate the practice of medicine or the conduct or content of medical education conducted by third parties, which may include uses that are not within approved or cleared device labeling. Manufacturers may provide unrestricted financial support for independent third party medical education programs in the form of educational grants intended to offset the cost of such programs. If the manufacturer controls or unduly influences the content of such programs, FDA considers those programs to be promotional activities by the manufacturer and thus subject to FDA regulation including promotional restrictions. We seek to ensure that our educational grants program is conducted in accordance with FDA criteria for independent educational activities. However, we cannot provide an assurance that FDA or other government authorities would view the third party programs we have supported as being independent. 10 Table of Contents Pervasive and Continuing Regulation . There are numerous regulatory requirements that apply after a product is cleared or approved by FDA, including, but not limited to annual establishment registration and product listing; current good manufacturing practice for devices, referred to as the Quality System Regulation (QSR); labeling requirements and advertising and promotion guidelines; assessing the significance of any changes to a device; monitoring and reporting serious and adverse events and certain device malfunctions; and reporting certain device corrections and removals. Our manufacturing facilities and processes are also subject to FDA inspections to ensure compliance with QSR. In addition to FDA regulation, the advertising and promotion of certain medical devices are also regulated by the Federal Trade Commission and by state regulatory and enforcement authorities. On occasion, promotional activities for FDA regulated products can be the subject of enforcement action brought under healthcare reimbursement laws and consumer protection statutes. In addition, under the Federal Lanham Act and similar state laws, competitors and others can initiate litigation relating to advertising claims. Fraud, Abuse and False Claims . We are directly and indirectly subject to various federal and state laws governing our relationship with healthcare providers. In particular, the Anti Kickback Statute is a federal criminal law that applies broadly and prohibits the knowing and willful offer or payment of remuneration to induce or reward patient referrals or the generation of business involving any item or service payable by a federal health care program. The federal False Claims Act (FCA) imposes civil liability on any person or entity that submits, or causes the submission of, a false or fraudulent claim to the United States government. Damages under the FCA consist of the imposition of fines and penalties and can be significant. The FCA also allows a private individual or entity with knowledge of past or present fraud against the federal government to sue on behalf of the government to recover the civil penalties and treble damages. AtriCure is a member of the Advanced Medical Technology Association (AdvaMed), a voluntary United States trade association for medical device manufacturers. This association has established guidelines and protocols for medical device manufacturers in their relationships with healthcare professionals on matters including research and development, product training and education, grants and charitable contributions, support of third party educational conferences and consulting arrangements. Adoption of the AdvaMed Code of Ethics for Interactions with Healthcare Professionals (the AdvaMed Code ) by a medical device manufacturer is voluntary, and while the Office of the Inspector General and other federal and state healthcare regulatory agencies encourage its adoption and may look to the AdvaMed Code, they do not view adoption of the AdvaMed Code as proof of compliance with applicable laws. We have adopted the AdvaMed Code and incorporated its principles in our standard operating procedures, employee training programs and relationships with medical professionals. AtriCure is a member of MedTech Europe, a voluntary trade association for the medical technology industry including diagnostics, medical devices and digital health. MedTech Europe and its members are committed to a high level of ethical business practices and have put in place strict guidelines to advise medical technology manufacturers on how to collaborate ethically with healthcare professionals (HCPs). These guidelines are set out in the MedTech Europe Code of Ethical Business Practice (MedTech Code), which regulates all aspects of the industry's relationships with HCPs and healthcare organizations (HCOs). It covers medical education and research and development. It also introduces an independent enforcement mechanism and transparency obligations. The Code sets clear and transparent rules for the industry's relationships with HCPs and HCOs, including company events, third party organized events, arrangements with consultants, gifts, research and financial support to medical education. We have adopted the MedTech Code and incorporated its principles in our standard operating procedures, employee training programs and relationships with medical professionals. Regulation Outside of the United States Sales of medical devices outside of the United States are subject to foreign governmental regulations which vary substantially from country to country. The time required to obtain certification or approval by a foreign country may be longer or shorter than that required for FDA clearance or approval and the requirements may be different, but the general trend is toward increasing regulation and greater requirements for the manufacturer to provide more bench testing and clinical evidence. While some harmonization of global regulations has occurred, requirements continue to differ significantly. In China, for example, the product must first have approval in the country of origin. In China, successful results from local product safety testing precedes submission of documentation to obtain approval. In addition, regulatory agencies and authorities can halt distribution within the country or otherwise take action in accordance with local laws. Conformity Assessment Pathway . In the European Union, various directives regulate the design, manufacture and labeling of medical devices, and more stringent conformity assessment requirements have been put in place with the 2017 11 Table of Contents Medical Device Regulation, effective May 26, 2021 The method for assessing conformity varies depending on the type and class of the product, but typically involves a combination of quality system assessment and product conformity assessment by a third party notified body, an independent and neutral institution appointed by a country to conduct the conformity assessment. This third party assessment includes a review of documentation related to the device that may be as extensive as the documentation requirements that the United States FDA requires for higher risk products. The notified body also audits the manufacturer quality system and performs a detailed review of the testing of the manufacturer device. Successful completion of a conformity assessment procedure allows a manufacturer to issue a declaration of conformity with the requirements of the relevant directive and affix the CE mark to the device. Devices that bear the CE mark may be commercially distributed throughout the member states of the European Union and other countries that comply with or mirror the medical device directives or medical device regulations. Pervasive and Continuing Regulation . There are numerous regulatory requirements that apply after a product has been approved by the notified body for CE marking, including, but not limited to labeling, advertising and promotion, reporting of device modifications, monitoring the safety of the product and performing corrections and removals when necessary, maintaining state of the art requirements for the devices through compliance with standards, and obtaining recertification of the quality system and individual device certificates on a periodic basis. Intellectual Property Protection of our intellectual property is a priority for our business, and we rely on a combination of patent, copyright, trademark and trade secret laws to protect our interests. Our ability to protect and use our intellectual property rights in the continued development and commercialization of our technologies and products, operate without infringing the proprietary rights of others, and prevent others from infringing our proprietary rights is important to our continued success. We will be able to protect our products and technologies from unauthorized use by third parties only to the extent that they are covered by valid and enforceable patents, trademarks or copyrights, or are effectively maintained as trade secrets, know how or other proprietary information. We hold numerous issued United States and international patents. We also have multiple pending United States and international patent applications. We seek patent protection relating to technologies and products we develop in both the United States and in selected foreign countries. While we own much of our intellectual property, including patents, patent applications, trademarks, trade secrets, know how and proprietary information, we also license patents and related technology of importance to the commercialization of our products. To continue developing and commercializing our current and future products, we may license intellectual property from commercial or academic entities to obtain the rights to technology that is required for our research, development and commercialization activities. All of our employees and technical consultants are required to execute confidentiality agreements in connection with their employment and consulting relationships with us. We also generally require them to agree to disclose and assign to us all inventions conceived in connection with their relationship with us. We devote significant resources to obtaining patents and other intellectual property and protecting our other proprietary information. If valid and enforceable, these patents may give us a means of blocking competitors from using infringing technology to compete directly with our products. We also have proprietary information that may not be patentable. With respect to proprietary information that is not patentable, we have chosen to rely on trade secret protection and confidentiality agreements to protect our interests. Manufacturing We assemble, inspect, test and package the majority of our products at our facilities in Ohio, and our products are sterilized by third parties. Purchased comp1nts are generally sourced from a single supplier, but alternatives to these suppliers are available in the event this would be needed. To minimize supply chain risks, we maintain inventory levels of comp1nts and raw materials specific to the respective part or device. We assess tooling and equipment on an ongoing basis. Order quantities and lead times for comp1nts purchased from outside suppliers are based on our forecasts derived from historical demand and anticipated future demand. Lead times may vary significantly depending on the size of the order, time required to fabricate and test the comp1nts, specific supplier requirements and current market demand for the comp1nts and subassemblies. To date, we have not experienced significant delays in obtaining any of our comp1nts. We regularly audit our suppliers for compliance with our quality system requirements, the QSR and or applicable ISO standards. We are an FDA registered medical device manufacturer and certified to ISO 134852016. In addition, we have successfully participated in the Medical Device Single Audit Program (MDSAP) and have been certified accordingly. The MDSAP program is recognized in Australia, Brazil, Canada, Europe, Japan and the United States. 12 Table of Contents We are subject to numerous federal, state and local laws relating to such matters as laboratory practices, the experimental use of animals, the use and disposal of hazardous or potentially hazardous substances, safe working conditions, manufacturing practices, environmental protection and fire hazard control. Consulting Relationships We have developed consulting relationships with scientists and physicians throughout the world to support our research and development, clinical and training and education programs. We work closely with these thought leaders to understand unmet needs and emerging applications for the treatment of Afib and other diseases and conditions. Our physician consulting agreements are intended to satisfy the requirements of the personal services Safe Harbor regulation as well as the AdvaMed Code and the MedTech Europe Code of Ethical Business Practice. As such, they provide for payment of a fair market value fee only for legitimate services rendered to us. We do not expect or require the consultant to utilize or promote our products, and consultants are required to disclose their relationship with us as appropriate, such as when publishing an article in which 1 of our products is discussed. Amounts paid to physicians in the United States are disclosed by us in annual reports submitted to CMS under the federal Open Payments law. Amounts paid to physicians in certain other countries are also disclosed by us in reports submitted to various governmental agencies in those countries, in accordance with the laws of the jurisdictions where those physicians reside or practice, or where the payments are made. Human Capital Management Successful execution of our strategy is dependent on attracting, developing and retaining key employees and members of our management team. The skills, experience and industry knowledge of our employees significantly benefit our operations and performance. We continuously evaluate, modify and enhance our internal processes to increase employee engagement, productivity and efficiency. We had approximately 875 employees as of January 31, 2022 N1 of the employees were represented by a labor union, and we have never experienced any employment related work stoppages. We consider our employee relations to be in good standing. At AtriCure, the employee experience is crucial to the ongoing success of the company. We work to provide a culture that augments the intrinsic rewards of our mission 1 where employees feel valued and supported every day. We strive to engage with our employees across every level of the organization, celebrate their personal milest1s and cultivate a sense of trust and transparency. Our culture provides opportunities for employees to feel a part of a community through paid leave for volunteering and individual recognition with Heart of AtriCure awards. Our employees have voted us as a Top Workplace six times in the past seven years, and our culture is regularly cited in our internal engagement surveys as a leading positive attribute of the Company. Our culture is a central asset to our Company. Employee Compensation and Benefits Competitive compensation and benefits are an integral part of our efforts to attract and retain world class talent. We are committed to regularly analyzing and evaluating the effectiveness of our compensation and benefit programs and benchmarking our programs against the market and our industry peers. Annual pay increases and other forms of incentive compensation are based on performance and market evaluation. Performance expectations are communicated to employees at the time of hiring, as well as upon internal transfer or promotion, and documented through our performance management process as part of our annual review procedures. Benefits for eligible U.S. based employees include medical, dental and vision insurance; paid leave for both vacation and illness; a 401(k) plan that includes a company matching contribution; a stock purchase plan enabling employees to purchase AtriCure stock at a reduced price; and life and disability insurance. Our international employee benefits vary due to local regulations and offerings. We ensure compliance with all statutory and mandatory benefits which vary by country, such as medical, disability, retirement pension, workers compensation, accident, social benefits and paid leave. Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion We have an ongoing commitment to advancing Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion (DE&I) throughout our workplace and the communities in which we operate. By honoring the dignity of each person, we foster a culture of inclusion where every1 is welcome. We do this by embracing diverse voices and experiences, supporting programs and resources that build an authentic and respectful workplace and providing fair and equitable opportunities for each person to contribute meaningfully in both their work and their personal lives. 13 Table of Contents We believe our workforce needs to be diverse, and leverage the skills and perspectives of a variety of backgrounds and experiences. To attract a global workforce, we strive to embed a culture where employees can bring their whole selves to work. Our 2021 DE&I efforts were overseen internally by our Diversity, Equity and Inclusion leader and Chief Human Resources Officer who work to further advance our commitment and programs by fostering employee understanding, intentionality and measurable processes. Training and Development Employee training and development is a priority at AtriCure. We strive to create an environment where employees can realize their potential. We provide a range of training courses and online resources, as well as developmental coaching and mentoring. We have a regular monthly schedule of opportunities that allows employees to access both instructor led classrooms and self directed web based courses. We are committed to identifying and developing the talents of our next generation leaders, and conduct a comprehensive review of our leadership team on an annual basis. In that process, we review existing leaders and prospective leaders throughout the organization and determine next best steps for their future development. Developmental plans for employees can range from leadership support to technical skill building. We also work to ensure all employees have access to training that is consistent with the competencies that are measured as part of performance management Delivering Results with Accountability, Initiative and Involvement, Teamwork and Support, and for those who manage people, Develop and Maintain High Performance Teams and Communication. Safety for All Employees We are committed to maintaining a safe workplace and promoting the well being of all of our employees. We have implemented multiple safety programs and regularly perform safety hazard evaluations within our facilities. Programs include our Emergency Site Action Plan for emergencies such as fire response, severe weather threats and shelter in place incidents, as well as our Certified First Responders safety program that include Red Cross training of employees in CPR, AED Usage and First Aid practices. We recognize that the use of tobacco is linked to many adverse health effects, including those that impact the heart, and we offer our employees tobacco cessation programs. Effective January 1, 2021, our Ohio office locations are entirely tobacco and nicotine free, and to the extent permitted in the states of our other offices, those locations are also entirely tobacco and nicotine free. Throughout the COVID 19 pandemic, our employees have been our first and foremost focus. We have implemented a number of long term measures to provide a safe work environment for our employees. AtriCure has provided regular, mandatory training for all employees on COVID 19 protocols that are consistent with Center for Disease Control recommendations and state and country specific guidelines. Such protocols and guidance is continually updated and made available to employees. We have also established decision making protocols for contact tracing, return to work, and sanitization. Employees who are able to perform essential functions of their job remotely are allowed to do so. For those who need to be in a facility to perform their work, strict adherence to our COVID 19 protocols is required, including temperature checks, wearing face coverings, socially distancing and other best practices surrounding hygiene to mitigate virus spread. We have not implemented any temporary or permanent reductions in headcount or to non executive employee compensation. Available Information Our principal executive offices are located at 7555 Innovation Way, Mason, Ohio and our teleph1 number is 513 755 4100. We are subject to the reporting requirements under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. Consequently, we are required to file reports and information with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) including reports on the following forms Form 10 K, Form 10 Q, Form 8 K, and amendments to those reports filed or furnished pursuant to Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. These reports and other information concerning us may be accessed through the SEC website at http www.sec.gov. You may also find, free of charge, on our website at http www.atricure.com, electronic copies of our Form 10 Ks, Form 10 Qs, Form 8 Ks and amendments to those reports filed or furnished pursuant to Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. Such filings are placed on our website as soon as reasonably practicable after they are filed or furnished, as the case may be, with the SEC. Our charters for our Audit, Compensation, Nominating and Corporate Governance, Strategy and Compliance, Quality and Risk Committees and our Code of Conduct are available on our website. In the event that we grant a waiver under our Code of Conduct to any of our officers or directors or make any material amendments to the Code of Conduct, we will publish it on our website within four business days. Information on our website is not deemed to be a part of this Form 10 K. 14 Table of Contents ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS The following discussion of risk factors contains forward looking statements. These risk factors may be important to understanding other statements in this report. The following information should be carefully considered in addition to the other information set forth in this report, including the Management Discussion and Analysis of Financial Conditions and Results of Operations section and Consolidated Financial Statements and accompanying notes. If any of the risks or uncertainties described below actually occur or continue to occur, our business, reputation, financial condition, results of operations, future prospects and stock price could be materially and adversely affected. The risks below are not the only risks we face and additional risks not currently known to us or that we presently deem immaterial may emerge or become material at any time and may negatively impact our business, reputation, financial condition, results of operations, future prospects or stock price. The order in which these factors appear should not be construed to indicate their relative importance or priority. Risk Factors Summary The following is a summary of the principal risks that could adversely affect our business, operations, financial results and stock price. COVID 19 Pandemic Risks COVID 19 pandemic may continue to affect the demand for our products, adversely impact our clinical trials and limit our ability to execute our business strategy. Commercial Execution and Product Performance Risks Failure to achieve widespread market acceptance domestically may harm operating results. Competition from existing and new products and procedures may decrease our market share. Clinical data may be negative, or our trials may not satisfy requirements of regulatory authorities, slowing or reversing the rate of adoption or reducing use of our products by the medical community. Our success depends, in part, on the commercial success of the EPi Sense device for the treatment of Afib following 2021 FDA pre market approval of this product. We may be unable to promptly train sufficient numbers of physicians in the use of our products, resulting in slower market acceptance. Reliance on independent distributors to sell our products in some international markets could adversely impact our sales. Industry Condition Risks Rising healthcare costs may result in efforts by government and private payors to contain or reduce healthcare spending, including for procedures that utilize our products. Adverse changes in payors policies toward coverage and reimbursement for surgical procedures would harm our ability to promote and sell our products. International sales may decrease if coverage and adequate levels of reimbursement from governmental and third party payors outside of the United States are not obtained and maintained. Operational Risks Unfavorable publicity relating to our business and industry could negatively impact our operations. Reliance upon single and limited source third party suppliers and logistics providers could harm our business if such third parties cannot provide materials or products or perform services for us in a timely manner. Our manufacturing operations are highly centralized and any disruption at our manufacturing facility could harm our business. Our business could be negatively impacted if we fail to successfully integrate acquisitions. If we fail to properly manage our anticipated growth, our business could suffer. If we cannot retain our skilled and experienced officers and other employees, or recruit, hire, train and integrate sufficient additional qualified personnel, our business may suffer. Disruptions of critical information systems or material breaches in the security of our systems could harm our business, customer relations and financial condition. Our insurance may not cover our indemnification obligations and other liabilities associated with our operations. 15 Table of Contents Legal & Compliance Risks We could face substantial penalties if we do not fully comply with federal, state and foreign regulations. We may be subject to fines, injunctions and penalties if we fail to comply with extensive FDA regulations. Unless and until we obtain additional FDA approval for our products, we will not be able to promote most of them to prevent stroke and our inability to maintain or grow our business could be harmed. We may be subject to fines, injunctions and penalties if we are found to be promoting our products for unapproved or off label uses. Modifications to our products may require new clearances or approvals by FDA; failure to obtain such clearances or approvals where required could result in a recall of the modified products and limitation on future sales until cleared or approved. If we or our third party vendors fail to comply with extensive FDA regulations relating to the manufacturing of our products we may be subject to fines, injunctions and penalties. Any adverse finding, judgement, settlement or enforcement action against us as a result of the current qui tam lawsuit could negatively affect our business. The use of products we sell may result in injuries or other adverse events that lead to product liability claims. Our ability to compete in the marketplace could be affected if our intellectual property rights fail to provide meaningful commercial protection for our products. Litigation and administrative proceedings over patent and other intellectual property rights are common in our industry, and any litigation or claim against us may cause us to incur substantial costs. We are subject to various regulatory and other risks related to selling our products internationally which could harm our revenue. Any allegation or determination of wrongdoing under the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act or other anti corruption laws could have a material adverse effect on our business. Compliance with European Union medical device regulation may limit our ability to sell our products in European markets. Financial Risks Our quarterly financial results are likely to fluctuate significantly. We have a history of net losses, and we may never become profitable. Our income tax expense could increase and adversely impact cash flows if our federal tax net operating loss and general business credit carryforwards expire or are limited. Governmental authorities may question our intercompany transfer pricing policies or change their laws in a manner that could increase our effective tax rate. Our goodwill may become impaired which could adversely affect our financial performance. We may take inventory related charges as a result of inaccurate forecasting or estimates of product life cycles which would negatively affect our gross margins and results of operations. We are subject to credit risk from our accounts receivable related to our sales. We may be unable to comply with the covenants of our Loan Agreement. Common Stock Risks We may fail to achieve our publicly announced guidance about our business which could cause a decline in our stock price. Securities analysts may discontinue coverage for our common stock or issue negative reports which could have a negative impact on the market price of our common stock. Our common stock may experience extreme fluctuations in the price and trading volume causing our stockholders to lose some or all of their investment. The sale of material amounts of common stock could encourage short sales by third parties and depress the price of our common stock causing our stockholders to lose part or all of their investment. Stockholder ownership of our common stock may be diluted if we sell common stock in a capital raising transaction or issue shares in a future acquisition. 16 Table of Contents Anti takeover provisions in our amended and restated certificate of incorporation and amended and restated bylaws and under Delaware law could inhibit a change in control or a change in management that stockholders consider favorable. Our stockholders must rely on stock appreciation for any return on investment as we do not expect to pay dividends in the foreseeable future. COVID 19 Pandemic Risks The outbreak of coronavirus (COVID 19) is materially and adversely affecting demand for our products and with prolonged delays, could continue to affect the demand for our products and impact our clinical trials, causing disruption to our business and negatively impacting our results of operations and financial condition. We are subject to risks related to public health crises such as the global pandemic associated with COVID 19. The COVID 19 outbreak has negatively impacted and, in the future may negatively impact, our operations and revenues and overall financial condition by significantly decreasing the number of procedures performed with our products. The number of procedures performed during 2020 and periods of 2021 significantly decreased as health care organizations globally deferred non emergent procedures to preserve resources and prioritized the treatment of patients with COVID 19. For example, in the United States, governmental authorities recommended, and in certain cases required, that elective, specialty and other procedures and appointments be suspended or canceled to avoid non essential patient exposure to medical environments and potential infection with COVID 19 and to focus limited resources and personnel on the treatment of COVID 19. Although we observed a decrease in such measures in mid 2021, emergence of the Omicron variant in late 2021 led to such measures being reinstated in many areas globally. We expect that challenges resulting from these recommendations and requirements will likely continue for the duration of the pandemic, and may significantly reduce our revenue. Our business was most impacted in the second, third and fourth quarters of 2020, in terms of the decline in patients and revenue from the shelter in place restrictions in a majority of countries and limitations on procedures in hospitals. We experienced sequential quarterly improvement beginning with the third quarter of 2020 as patient procedure volume trends and availability of healthcare resources improved as certain restrictions were lifted and limitations eased even though our third and fourth quarter 2020 revenue was below that in prior year periods. Despite these challenges, we experienced increased recovery in patient utilization and revenue during 2021; however, there continues to be variability as variants of the virus emerge and impact both procedure volumes and hospital staffing, which may significantly reduce our revenue while the pandemic continues. Numerous state and local jurisdictions have imposed, and others in the future may impose, shelter in place orders, quarantines, vaccination requirements, executive orders and similar government orders and restrictions for their residents to control the spread of COVID 19. Such orders or restrictions have resulted in slowdowns and delays, travel restrictions and cancellation of events, among other effects. Other disruptions or potential disruptions include restrictions on our personnel and partners to travel and access customers for training and case support; delays in approvals by regulatory bodies; delays in product development efforts; and additional government requirements or other incremental mitigation efforts that may further impact our or our suppliers capacity to manufacture, sell and support the use of our products. We expect that challenges resulting from these recommendations and requirements will likely continue for the duration of the pandemic, which is uncertain. We may experience diversion of healthcare resources away from the conduct of clinical trials, including the diversion of hospitals serving as our clinical trial sites. Key clinical trial activities, such as clinical trial site monitoring, subject visits and study procedures, may be interrupted due to limitations imposed or recommended by federal or state governments, trial sites, employers or others. We may also encounter interruption or delays in the operations of FDA or other regulatory authorities, which may impact review and approval timelines. In addition, the COVID 19 pandemic may impact the trading price of shares of our common stock and could impact our ability to raise additional capital on a timely basis or at all. The COVID 19 pandemic continues to rapidly evolve. The extent to which COVID 19 may impact our business, including our nonclinical activities, clinical trials and financial condition, will depend on future developments, which are highly uncertain, such as the geographic spread of the disease (including new variants of COVID 19); the duration and severity of the pandemic, travel restrictions, business closures or business disruptions; the distribution and efficacy of vaccines and other treatments; U.S. and foreign government actions to respond to the reduction in global economic activity; and how quickly and to what extent normal economic and operating conditions can resume. To the extent the COVID 19 pandemic adversely affects our business and financial results, it may also have the effect of heightening many of the other risks set forth in this Risk Factors section. 17 Table of Contents Commercial Execution and Product Performance Risks If our products do not achieve widespread market acceptance in the United States, our operating results will be harmed, and we may not achieve or sustain profitability. Our success depends in large part on the medical community acceptance of our products in the United States, which is the largest revenue market in the world for medical devices. Our ablation and LAAM product sales in the United States generate the majority of our revenue. We expect that sales of these products will continue to account for a majority of our revenue for the foreseeable future and that our future revenue will depend on the increasing acceptance by the medical community of our products as standard of care for treating Afib, managing the LAA and managing pain with Cryo Nerve Block therapy. The U.S. medical community acceptance of our products will depend upon our ability to demonstrate the safety and efficacy, advantages, long term clinical performance and cost effectiveness of our products. In addition, acceptance of products for the treatment of Afib is dependent upon, among other factors, the level of awareness and education of the medical community about the surgical treatment of Afib and the existence, effectiveness and safety of our products. Market acceptance and adoption of our products for the treatment of Afib also depends on the level of health insurer (including Medicare) reimbursement to physicians and hospitals for procedures using our products. Negative publicity resulting from incidents involving our products, or similar products could have a significant adverse effect on the overall acceptance of our products. If we encounter difficulties growing the market for our products in the U.S., we may not be able to increase our revenue enough to achieve or sustain profitability, and our business and operating results will be seriously harmed. Competition from existing and new products and procedures may decrease our market share and may cause our revenue to decline, and could adversely affect our operating results. The medical device industry, including the market for the treatment of Afib, is highly competitive, is subject to rapid technological change and can be significantly affected by new product introductions and promotional activities. There is no assurance that our products will compete effectively against drugs, catheter based ablation, implantable devices, other surgical ablation devices or other products or techniques to occlude the left atrial appendage. Our products may become obsolete prior to the end of their anticipated useful lives, or we may introduce new products or next generation products prior to the end of the useful life of our current products, either of which may require us to dispose of existing inventory and related capital equipment and or write off their value or accelerate their depreciation. In addition, other products may be sold at lower prices. Due to the size of the Afib and LAA management markets, we anticipate that new or existing competitors may develop competing products, procedures and or clinical solutions. There are few barriers to prevent new entrants or existing competitors from developing products to compete directly with ours. Companies also compete with us to attract qualified scientific and technical personnel as well as funding. Most of our competitors and potential competitors have greater financial, manufacturing, marketing and research and development capabilities than we have, and may obtain FDA approval or clearance for their products. The introduction of new products, procedures or clinical solutions, or our competitors obtaining FDA approvals or clearances, may result in price reductions, reduced margins, loss of market share, or may render our products obsolete, which could adversely affect our revenue and future profitability. Any clinical data that is generated regarding our products may not be positive, and our current and planned clinical trials may not satisfy the requirements of the FDA or other regulatory authorities. Our clinical trials are expensive to conduct, typically taking many years to complete and have uncertain outcomes. Delays in patient enrollment or failure of patients to consent or continue to participate in a clinical trial may cause an increase in costs and delays in the approval and attempted commercialization of our products or result in the failure of the clinical trial. Conducting successful clinical studies may require the enrollment of large numbers of clinical sites and patients, and suitable patients may be difficult to identify and recruit. Patient enrollment in clinical trials and completion of patient participation and follow up depends on many factors, including the size of the patient population; the nature of the trial protocol; the attractiveness of, or the discomforts and risks associated with, the treatments received by enrolled subjects; the availability of appropriate clinical trial investigators, support staff, and proximity of patients to clinical sites; and the ability to comply with the eligibility and exclusion criteria for participation in the clinical trial and patient compliance. Our products will be measured on their efficacy which is dependent on the number of patients that experience Afib or stroke following treatment with our products and the number of patients that have serious complications resulting from ablations or LAA exclusion using our products. We cannot provide any assurance that the data collected during our clinical trials will be compelling to the medical community because it may not be scientifically meaningful, may identify unexpected safety concerns, and may not demonstrate that procedures utilizing our products are an attractive option when 18 Table of Contents compared against data from alternative procedures and products. Negative data could affect the use of our products and harm our business and prospects. Conversely, positive results from clinical trial experience should not be relied upon as evidence that any of our products will gain market acceptance or that they will satisfy regulatory requirements for product approval. There can be no assurance that the results of studies conducted by collaborators or other third parties will be viewed favorably or are indicative of our own future study results. We may be required to demonstrate with substantial evidence through well controlled clinical trials that our product candidates are either (i) safe and effective for use in a diverse population for their intended uses or (ii) are substantially equivalent to predicate devices under section 510(k) of the Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act (FDCA). Success in early clinical trials does not mean that future clinical trials will be successful because product candidates in later stage clinical trials may fail to demonstrate sufficient safety and efficacy to the satisfaction of the FDA and other regulatory authorities despite having progressed through initial clinical trials. Our devices and products may not be approved or cleared even though clinical or other data, in our view, are adequate to support an approval or clearance. The FDA or other regulatory authorities may disagree with our trial design and our interpretation of data from preclinical studies and clinical trials; change requirements for the approval or clearance of a product candidate even after reviewing and providing comment on a protocol for a pivotal clinical trial; approve or clear a product candidate for fewer or more limited indications or uses than we request; grant approval or clearance contingent on the performance of costly post marketing clinical trials; or not approve the labeling claims necessary or desirable for the successful commercialization of our product candidates. These factors would affect the rate at which our products are adopted in the medical community. Our success depends, in part, on the commercial success of the EPi Sense device for the treatment of Afib following FDA pre market approval of this product. On April 29, 2021, we announced FDA approval of the EPi Sense System to treat patients diagnosed with long standing persistent Afib. Our success depends, in part, on the medical community acceptance of this and other of our products in the United States. We expect that our future revenue will depend largely on the increasing acceptance by the medical community of our products as standard of care for treating Afib. The U.S. medical community acceptance of the EPi Sense System and other of our products will depend upon our ability to demonstrate long term clinical performance and advantages and cost effectiveness of our products. In addition, acceptance of products for the treatment of Afib is dependent upon, among other factors, the level of awareness and education of the medical community about the surgical treatment of Afib and the existence, effectiveness and safety of our products. Market acceptance and adoption of our products or procedures for the treatment of Afib, including but not limited to the EPi Sense System, also depends on the level of health insurer (including Medicare) reimbursement to physicians and hospitals for procedures using our products. Negative publicity resulting from incidents involving our products, or similar products, could have a significant adverse effect on the overall acceptance of our products. Market acceptance could be delayed by lack of physician willingness to attend training sessions by the time required to complete this training, or by state or institutional restrictions on our ability to provide training. If we are unable to gain and or maintain such support, training services and collaboration, our ability to grow the market for our products may be impacted and we may not be able to increase our revenue enough to achieve or sustain profitability, and our business and operating results may be seriously harmed. Our success is dependent on our ability to train surgeons in the safe and effective use of our products. Restrictions on our ability to train surgeons, or unwillingness of surgeons to participate in such training, could reduce the market acceptance of our products. Our research and development efforts and our marketing strategy depend heavily on obtaining support, physician training assistance and collaboration from experienced physicians at leading commercial and research hospitals, particularly in the U.S. and Europe. We deliver training on the safe and effective use of our products consistent with their FDA (or equivalent regulatory body) approved or cleared indications. While we train providers in the safe and effective use of our products, we do not train them to use any of our products specifically to treat Afib unless the product is FDA approved specifically for the treatment of Afib. In order for surgeons to learn to use our products, they must attend training sessions to familiarize themselves with the products, and they must be committed to learning the technology. Further, surgeons must utilize the technology on a regular basis to ensure they maintain the skill set necessary to use the products. Continued market acceptance could be delayed by lack of surgeon willingness to attend training sessions, by the time 19 Table of Contents required to complete this training or by state or institutional restrictions on our ability to provide training. If we are unable to gain and or maintain such support, training services and collaboration, our ability to market our products and, as a result, our financial condition, results of operations and cash flow, could be materially and adversely affected. We rely on independent distributors to market and sell our products in certain markets outside of the United States, and a failure of our independent distributors to successfully market our products or any disruption in their ability to do so may adversely impact our sales. We depend on independent third party distributors to sell our products in certain markets outside of the United States, and if these distributors do not perform, we may be unable to maintain or increase international revenue. We intend to grow our business outside of the United States, and to do so, we will need to attract additional distributors or hire direct sales personnel to expand the territories in which we sell our products. Independent distributors may terminate their relationship with us or devote insufficient sales efforts to our products. We are not able to control our independent distributors, and they may not be successful in marketing our products. In addition, many of our independent distributors outside of the United States initially obtain and maintain foreign regulatory approval for sale of our products in their respective countries. Our failure to maintain our relationships with our independent distributors outside of the United States, or our failure to recruit and retain additional skilled independent distributors in these locations, could have an adverse effect on our operations. Turnover among our independent distributors, even if replaced, may adversely affect our short term financial results while we transition to new independent distributors or direct sales personnel. The ability of these independent distributors to market and sell our products could also be adversely affected by unexpected events, including, but not limited to, power failures, nuclear events, local economic and political conditions, natural or other disasters and war or terrorist activities. In addition, the ability of our independent distributors to borrow m1y from their existing lenders or to obtain credit from other sources to purchase our products may be impaired or our independent distributors could experience a significant change in their liquidity or financial condition, all of which could impair their ability to distribute our products and eventually lead to distributor turnover, and may adversely impact our sales. Industry Conditions Risks Healthcare costs have risen significantly over the past decade. There have been and may continue to be proposals by legislators, regulators and third party payors to keep, contain or reduce healthcare costs. The continuing efforts of governments, insurance companies and other payors of healthcare costs to contain or reduce these costs, combined with closer scrutiny of such costs, could lead to patients being unable to obtain approval for payment from these third party payors. The cost containment measures that healthcare providers are instituting both in the U.S. and internationally could harm our business. Some healthcare providers in the U.S. have adopted or are considering a managed care system in which the providers contract to provide comprehensive healthcare for a fixed cost per person. Healthcare providers may attempt to control costs by authorizing fewer elective surgical procedures or by requiring the use of the least expensive devices possible, which could adversely affect the demand for our products or the price at which we can sell our products. Some healthcare providers have sought to consolidate and create new companies with greater market power, including hospitals. As the healthcare industry consolidates, competition to provide products and services has become and will continue to become more intense. This has resulted and likely will continue to result in greater pricing pressures and the exclusion of certain suppliers from important marketing segments. Adverse changes in payors policies toward coverage and reimbursement for surgical procedures would harm our ability to promote and sell our products. Third party payors are increasingly exerting pressure on medical device companies to reduce their prices. Even to the extent that the use of our products is reimbursed by private payors and governmental payors, adverse changes in payors policies toward coverage and reimbursement for surgical procedures would also harm our ability to promote and sell our products. Payors continue to review their policies and can, without notice, deny coverage for treatments that include the use of our products. Because each third party payor individually approves coverage and reimbursement, obtaining these approvals may be time consuming and costly. In addition, third party payors may require us to provide scientific and clinical support for the use of our products. Adverse changes in coverage and reimbursement for surgical procedures could harm our business and reduce our revenue. FDA does not regulate the practice of medicine. Physicians may use our products in circumstances where they deem it medically appropriate, such as for the treatment of Afib or the reduction in stroke risk, even though FDA may not have approved or cleared our products to be marketed specifically for those indications. Some payors may deny coverage or payment for the use of our products for indications not specifically approved or cleared by FDA. Often, these denials can be overcome through an appeals process, but there is no guarantee of success in these cases. 20 Table of Contents If coverage and adequate levels of reimbursement from governmental and third party payors outside of the United States are not obtained and maintained, sales of our products outside of the United States may decrease, and we may fail to achieve or maintain significant sales outside of the United States. Our revenue generated from sales outside of the United States is also dependent upon coverage and reimbursement within prevailing foreign healthcare payment systems. Foreign healthcare payors generally do not provide the same level of reimbursement for sole therapy minimally invasive procedures utilizing ablation devices and related products as payors in the United States. In addition, healthcare cost containment efforts similar to those we face in the United States are prevalent in many of the other countries in which we sell our products, and these efforts are expected to continue. To the extent that the use of our devices has historically received reimbursement under a foreign healthcare payment system, such reimbursement, if any, has typically been significantly less than the reimbursement provided in the United States. If coverage and adequate levels of reimbursement from governmental and third party payors outside of the United States are not obtained and maintained, sales of our products outside of the United States may decrease, and we may fail to achieve or maintain significant sales outside of the United States. Operational Risks We may experience unfavorable publicity relating to our business and our industry. This publicity could have a negative impact on our ability to attract and retain customers, our sales, clinical studies involving our products, our reputation and our stock price. We may experience a negative impact on our business from newspaper articles or other media reports relating to, among other things, our compliance with FDA regulations for medical device reporting, adverse patient and clinical outcomes and concerns over disclosure of financial relationships between us and our consultants. We believe that such publicity would potentially have a negative impact on our clinical studies, business, results of operations and financial condition, or cause other adverse effects, including a decline in the price of our stock. We rely upon single and limited source third party suppliers and third party logistics providers, making us vulnerable to supply problems and price fluctuations which could harm our business. We rely on single and limited source third party vendors for the manufacture and sterilization of comp1nts used in our products. For example, we rely on 1 vendor to manufacture several of our RF generators, as well as separate vendors to manufacture our EPi Sense System and related RF generator. It would be a time consuming and lengthy process to secure these products from an alternative supplier. We have significant concentrations with a limited number of vendors. We also rely on a third party to handle our warehousing and logistics functions for European and Middle Eastern markets on our behalf. Our reliance on outside manufacturers, sterilizers and suppliers also subjects us to risks that could harm our business, including we may not be able to obtain adequate supply in a timely manner or on commercially reasonable terms; we may have difficulty timely locating and qualifying alternative suppliers; switching comp1nts may require product redesign and new submissions to FDA which could significantly delay production or, if FDA refuses to approve the changes, completely eliminate our ability to sell our products; our suppliers manufacture products for a range of customers, and fluctuations in demand for the products those suppliers manufacture for others may affect their ability to deliver comp1nts to us in a timely manner; and our suppliers may encounter financial hardships unrelated to our demand for comp1nts, which could inhibit their ability to fulfill our orders and meet our requirements. Identifying and qualifying additional or replacement suppliers for any of the comp1nts used in our products or a replacement warehousing and logistics provider, if required, may not be accomplished quickly and could involve significant additional costs. Any interruption or delay in the supply of comp1nts, materials or warehousing and logistics, or our inability to obtain comp1nts or materials from alternate sources at acceptable prices in a timely manner, could impair our ability to meet the demand of our customers and cause them to cancel orders or switch to competitive products and could therefore have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. 21 Table of Contents Our manufacturing operations are conducted at a single location, and any disruption at our manufacturing facility could increase our expenses and decrease our revenue. Our manufacturing operations are conducted at a single location in Ohio. While we take precautions at the Ohio location, we do not maintain a backup manufacturing facility, making us dependent on the current facility and production workers for the continued operation of our business. A natural or other disaster could damage or destroy our manufacturing equipment and cause substantial delays in our manufacturing operations, which could lead to additional expense and decreased revenue due to lack of supply. The insurance we maintain may not be adequate to cover our losses. With or without insurance, damage to our facility or our other property due to a natural disaster or casualty event could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. We may enter into significant acquisitions in the future. Acquisitions have inherent uncertainties and involve risks and difficulties in integrating that may adversely affect our business, results of operations and financial condition. All acquisitions involve inherent uncertainties, which may include, among other things, our ability to successfully identify targets for acquisition; negotiate reasonable terms; properly perform due diligence and determine significant risks associated with a particular acquisition; properly evaluate target company management capabilities; and successfully transition and integrate the acquired company into our business and achieve the desired performance. We may acquire businesses with unknown liabilities, contingent liabilities or internal control deficiencies. We have plans and procedures in place to conduct reviews of potential acquisition candidates for compliance with applicable regulations and laws prior to acquisition. Despite these efforts, realization of any of these liabilities or deficiencies may increase our expenses, adversely affect our financial position through the initiation, pendency or outcome of litigation or otherwise, or cause us to fail to meet our public financial reporting obligations. We have consummated 3 significant acquisitions since 2013 and in the future may continue to invest a substantial amount of capital in acquisitions. We continue to evaluate potential acquisition opportunities to support, strengthen and grow our business. There can be no assurance that we will be able to locate suitable acquisition candidates, acquire possible acquisition candidates, acquire such candidates on commercially reasonable terms, or integrate acquired businesses successfully in the future. In addition, any governmental review or investigation of our proposed acquisitions, such as by the Federal Trade Commission, may impede, limit or prevent us from proceeding with an acquisition. Future acquisitions may require us to incur additional debt and contingent liabilities, which may adversely affect our business, results of operations and financial condition. The process of integrating acquired businesses into our existing operations may result in operating, contract and supply chain difficulties, such as the failure to retain customers or management personnel. Such difficulties may divert significant financial, operational and managerial resources from our existing operations and make it more difficult to achieve our operating and strategic objectives. If we fail to properly manage our anticipated growth, our business could suffer. We may experience periods of rapid growth and expansion, which could place a significant strain on our personnel, information technology systems and other resources. In particular, the increase in our direct sales force requires significant management and other supporting resources. Any failure by us to manage our growth effectively could have an adverse effect on our ability to achieve our development and commercialization goals. To achieve our revenue goals, we must successfully increase production output as required by customer demand. In the future, we may experience difficulties in increasing production, including problems with production yields and quality control, comp1nt supply and shortages of qualified personnel. These problems could result in delays in product availability and increases in expenses. Any such delay or increased expense could adversely affect our ability to generate revenues. Future growth will also impose significant added responsibilities on management, including the need to identify, recruit, train and integrate additional employees. In addition, rapid and significant growth will place a strain on our administrative and operational infrastructure. In order to manage our operations and growth, we will need to continue to improve our operational and management controls, reporting and information technology systems and financial internal control procedures. If we are unable to manage our growth effectively, it may be difficult for us to execute our business strategy and our operating results and business could suffer. 22 Table of Contents We depend on our officers and other skilled and experienced personnel to operate our business effectively. If we are not able to retain our current employees or recruit, hire, train and integrate additional qualified personnel, our business will suffer and our future revenue and profitability will be impaired. We are highly dependent on the skills and experience of our President and Chief Executive Officer, Michael H. Carrel, and certain other officers and key employees. We do not have any insurance in the event of the death or disability of key personnel. Our officers and key employees, with the exception of our President and Chief Executive Officer, do not have employment agreements, and they may terminate their employment and work elsewhere without notice and without cause or good reason. Currently we have non compete agreements with our officers and other employees. Due to the specialized knowledge of each of our officers with respect to our products and our operations and the limited pool of people with relevant experience in the medical device field, the loss of service of 1 or more of these individuals could significantly affect our ability to operate and manage our business. The announcement of the loss of 1 or more of our key personnel could negatively affect our stock price. We depend on our scientific and technical personnel for successful product development and innovation, which are critical to the success of our business. In addition, to succeed in the implementation of our business strategy, our management team must rapidly execute our sales strategy, obtain expanded FDA clearances and approvals, achieve market acceptance for our products and further develop products, while managing anticipated growth by implementing effective planning, manufacturing and operating processes. Managing this growth will require us to attract and retain additional management and technical personnel. We rely primarily on direct sales employees to sell our products in the United States and in Europe, and failure to adequately train them in the use and benefits of our products will prevent us from achieving our market share and revenue growth goals. We have key relationships with physicians that involve procedure, product, market and clinical development. If any of these physicians end their relationship with us, our business could be negatively impacted. We cannot assure you that we will be able to attract and retain the personnel and physician relationships necessary to grow and expand our business and operations. If we fail to identify, attract, retain and motivate these highly skilled personnel and physicians, we may be unable to continue our development and sales activities. Disruptions of critical information systems or material breaches in the security of our systems could harm our business, customer relations and financial condition. In the ordinary course of our business, we collect and store sensitive data, including intellectual property, our proprietary business information and that of our customers, suppliers and business partners, and personally identifiable information of our customers and employees in our data centers and on our ne2rks. The secure processing, maintenance and transmission of this information is critical to our operations and business strategy. Like other companies, we experience attempts to gain unauthorized access to our systems and information on a regular basis. Despite our security measures, including employee training, our information technology and infrastructure are vulnerable to cyber attacks, malicious intrusions, breakdowns, destruction, loss of data privacy, breaches due to employee error, malfeasance or other disruptions. Cyber attacks are becoming more sophisticated and frequent, and our systems could be the target of malware, ransomware and other cyber attacks. We have invested in our systems and the protection of our data to reduce the risk of an intrusion or interruption, and we monitor our systems on an ongoing basis for any current or potential threats. We can give no assurances that these measures and efforts will prevent interruptions or breakdowns. If we are unable to detect or prevent a security breach or cyber attack or other disruption from occurring, then we could incur losses or damage to our data, or inappropriate disclosure of our confidential information or that of others; and we could sustain damage to our reputation and customer and employee relationships, suffer disruptions to our business and incur increased operating costs including costs to mitigate any damage caused and protect against future damage, and be exposed to additional regulatory scrutiny or penalties and to civil litigation and possible financial liability, any of which could have a material adverse effect on our business, operating margins, revenues and competitive position. We also rely in part on information technology to store information, interface with customers, maintain financial accuracy, secure our data and accurately produce our financial statements. If our information technology systems do not effectively and securely collect, store, process and report relevant data for the operation of our business, whether due to equipment malfunction or constraints, software deficiencies, human error or cyber incident, our ability to effectively plan, forecast and execute our business plan and comply with applicable laws and regulations could be materially impaired. Any such impairment could have a material adverse effect on our results of operations, financial condition and the timeliness with which we report our operating results. Our insurance may not cover our indemnification obligations and other liabilities associated with our operations. We maintain insurance designed to provide coverage for ordinary risks associated with our operations and our ordinary indemnification obligations, which we believe to be customary for our industry. The coverage provided by such 23 Table of Contents insurance may not be adequate for claims we may make or may be contested by our insurance carriers. If our insurance is not adequate or available to pay liabilities associated with our operations, or if we are unable to purchase adequate insurance at reasonable rates in the future, our business, financial condition, results of operations or cash flows may be materially adversely impacted. Legal & Compliance Risks We spend considerable time and m1y complying with federal, state and foreign regulations in addition to FDA regulations, and, if we do not fully comply with such regulations, we could face substantial penalties. We are subject to extensive regulation by the federal government and foreign countries in which we conduct business. The laws that affect our ability to operate our business in addition to the FDCA and FDA regulations include, but are not limited to, the following the Federal Anti Kickback Statute, which prohibits persons from knowingly and willfully soliciting, offering, receiving or providing remuneration, directly or indirectly, in cash or in kind, to induce either the referral of an individual, or furnishing or arranging for a good or service, for which payment may be made under federal healthcare programs such as the Medicare and Medicaid Programs; the Federal False Claims Act, which prohibits submitting a false claim or causing the submission of a false claim to the government; Medicare laws and regulations that prescribe the requirements for coverage and payment, including the amount of such payment, and laws prohibiting false claims for reimbursement under Medicare and Medicaid; state consumer protection, fraud and business practice laws, including the California Consumer Privacy Act ( CCPA ), which became effective on January 1, 2020, which among other things, requires new disclosures to California consumers and provides consumers new abilities to opt out of certain sales of personal information; state laws that prohibit the practice of medicine by non doctors and by doctors not licensed in a particular state, and fee splitting arrangements between doctors and non doctors, as well as state law equivalents to the Anti Kickback Statute and the Stark Law, which may not be limited to government reimbursed Item; federal and state healthcare fraud and abuse laws or laws protecting the privacy of patient medical information, including the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (HIPAA) which protects medical records and other personal health information by limiting their use and disclosure, giving individuals the right to access, amend and seek accounting reasonably necessary to accomplish the intended purpose; laws and regulations with respect to the collection, use, disclosure, transfer and storage of personal data that we may collect from our employees, consultants or in conjunction with clinical trials such as the General Data Protection Regulation in the European Union; the Federal Trade Commission Act and similar laws regulating advertising and consumer protection; and similar and other regulations outside the United States. Healthcare fraud and abuse regulations are complex, and even minor, inadvertent irregularities can potentially give rise to claims that a law has been violated. Any violations of these laws could result in a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. If there is a change in law, regulation or administrative or judicial interpretations, we may have to change our business practices or our existing business practices could be challenged as unlawful, which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Our manufacturing operations and research and development activities involve the use of biological materials and hazardous substances and are subject to a variety of federal, state and local environmental laws and regulations relating to the storage, use, discharge, disposal, remediation of and human exposure to hazardous substances. Our research and development and manufacturing operations may produce biological waste materials, such as animal tissues and certain chemical waste. These operations are permitted by regulatory authorities, and the resultant waste materials are disposed of in compliance with environmental laws and regulations. Compliance with these laws and regulations may be expensive, and non compliance could result in substantial liabilities. In addition, we cannot eliminate the risk of accidental contamination or injury to third parties from the use, storage, handling or disposal of these materials. In the event of contamination or injury, we could be held liable for any resulting damages, and any liability could exceed any applicable insurance coverage we may have. Our manufacturing operations may result in the release, discharge, emission or disposal 24 Table of Contents of hazardous substances that could cause us to incur substantial liabilities, including costs for investigation and remediation. If our past or present operations are found to be in violation of any of the laws described above or the other governmental regulations to which we, our distributors or our customers are subject, we may be subject to the applicable penalty associated with the violation, including civil and criminal penalties, damages, fines, exclusion from Medicare, Medicaid and other government programs and the curtailment or restructuring of our operations. If we are required to obtain permits or licensure under these laws that we do not already possess, we may become subject to substantial additional regulation or incur significant expense. Any penalties, damages, fines, curtailment or restructuring of our operations would adversely affect our ability to operate our business and our financial results. The risk of our being found in violation of these laws is increased by the fact that many of them have not been fully or clearly interpreted by the regulatory authorities or the courts, and their provisions are subject to a variety of interpretations and additional legal or regulatory change. Any action against us for violation of these laws, even if we successfully defend against it, could cause us to incur significant legal expenses, divert our management attention from the operation of our business and damage our reputation. If we fail to comply with the extensive FDA regulations relating to our business, we may be subject to fines, injunctions and penalties, and our ability to commercially distribute and promote our products may be hurt. Our products are classified by FDA as medical devices and, as such, are subject to extensive regulation by FDA and numerous other federal, state and foreign governmental authorities. FDA regulations, guidance, notices and other issuances specific to medical devices are broad and regulate numerous aspects of our business. Compliance with FDA, state and other regulations can be complex, expensive and time consuming. FDA and other authorities have broad enforcement powers. Furthermore, changes in the applicable governmental regulations could prevent further commercialization of our products and technologies and could materially harm our business. If a serious failure to comply with applicable regulatory requirements was determined, it could result in enforcement action by FDA or other state or federal agencies, including the U.S. Department of Justice (USDOJ), which may include any of the following sanctions, among others warning letters, fines, injunctions, consent decrees and civil penalties; repair, replacement, refunds, recall or seizure of our products; operating restrictions, partial suspension or total shutdown of production; suspension or termination of our clinical trials; refusing or delaying our pending requests for 510(k) clearance or PMAs, new intended uses or modifications to existing products; withdrawing 510(k) clearance or PMAs that have already been granted; and criminal prosecution. If any of these events were to occur, we could lose customers and our production, product sales, business, results of operations and financial condition would be harmed. We are also subject to medical device reporting regulations that require us to file reports with FDA if our products may have caused or contributed to a death or serious injury or, in the event of product malfunction, that if such malfunction were to recur, would likely cause or contribute to a death or serious injury. There have been incidents, including patient deaths, which have occurred during or following procedures using our products that we have not reported to FDA because we determined that our products did not malfunction and did not cause or contribute to the outcomes in these incidents. If FDA disagrees with us, however, and determines that we should have submitted reports for these adverse events, we could be subject to significant regulatory fines or other penalties. In addition, the number of medical device reports we make, or the magnitude of the problems reported, could cause us or FDA to terminate or modify our clinical trials or recall or cease the sale of our products, and could hurt commercial acceptance of our products and harm our reputation with customers. 25 Table of Contents Unless and until we obtain additional FDA approval for our products, we will not be able to promote most of them to prevent stroke, and our ability to maintain and grow our business could be harmed. We may be subject to fines, penalties, injunctions and other sanctions if we are deemed to be promoting the use of our products for unapproved, or off label, uses. Our business and future growth depend on the continued use of our products for the treatment of Afib. Unless the products are approved or cleared by FDA specifically for the treatment of Afib or prevention of stroke, we may not make claims about the safety or effectiveness of our products for such uses. In order to obtain additional FDA approvals to promote our products for the treatment of Afib or reduction in stroke risk, we will need to demonstrate in clinical trials that our products are safe and effective for such use. Development of sufficient and appropriate clinical protocols to demonstrate quality, safety and efficacy may be required and we may not adequately develop such protocols to support approval. We cannot assure you that any of our clinical trials will be completed in a timely manner or successfully or that the results obtained will be acceptable to FDA. We, FDA or the IRB may suspend a clinical trial at any time for various reasons, including a belief that the risks to study subjects outweigh the anticipated benefits. These limitations present a material risk that FDA or other federal or state law enforcement authorities could determine that the nature and scope of our sales, marketing and or support activities, though designed to comply with all FDA requirements, constitute the promotion of our products for an unapproved use in violation of the FDCA. We also face the risk that FDA or other governmental authorities might pursue enforcement based on past activities that we have discontinued or changed, including sales activities, arrangements with institutions and doctors, educational and training programs and other activities. Investigations concerning the promotion of unapproved uses and related issues, are typically expensive, disruptive and burdensome and generate negative publicity. If our promotional activities are found to be in violation of the law, we may face significant fines and penalties and may be required to substantially change our sales, promotion, grant and educational activities. There is also a possibility that we could be enjoined from selling some or all of our products for any unapproved use. Although our Isolator Synergy System and EPi Sense System have received FDA approval for the treatment of some forms of Afib in certain procedures, we have not received FDA clearance or approval to promote our other products for the treatment of Afib or the prevention of stroke. Unless and until we obtain FDA clearance or approval for the use of our other products to treat Afib or prevent stroke, we, and others acting on our behalf, may not claim in the U.S. that such products are safe and effective for such uses or otherwise promote them for such uses. Similar restrictions exist outside of the U.S. There is no assurance that future clearances or approvals of our products will be granted or that current or future clearances or approvals will not be withdrawn. Failure to obtain a clearance or approval or loss of an existing clearance or approval, could hurt our ability to maintain and grow our business. Modifications to our products may require new clearances or approvals or may require us to cease promoting or to recall the modified products until such clearances or approvals are obtained and FDA may not agree with our conclusions regarding whether new clearances or approvals were required. Any modification to a 510(k) cleared device that would constitute a change in its intended use, design or manufacture could require a new or supplemental 510(k) clearance or, possibly, submission and FDA approval of a PMA application. FDA requires every medical device company to make the determination as to whether a 510(k) must be filed, but FDA may review any medical device company decision. We have made modifications to our products and concluded that such modifications did not require us to submit a new or supplemental 510(k). FDA may not agree with our decisions regarding whether submissions were required. If FDA were to disagree with us and require us to submit a 510(k), PMA or a PMA supplement for then existing modifications, we could be required to cease promoting or to recall the modified product until we obtain clearance or approval. In addition, we could be subject to significant regulatory fines or other penalties. Furthermore, our products could be subject to recall if FDA determines, for any reason, that our products are not safe or effective or that appropriate regulatory submissions were not made. Delays in receipt or failure to receive clearances or approvals, the loss of previously received clearances or approvals or the failure to comply with existing or future regulatory requirements could reduce our sales, profitability and future growth prospects. If we or our third party vendors fail to comply with extensive FDA regulations relating to the manufacturing of our products or any comp1nt part, we may be subject to fines, injunctions and penalties, and our ability to commercially distribute and sell our products may be hurt. Our manufacturing facilities and the manufacturing facilities of any of our third party comp1nt manufacturers, critical suppliers or third party sterilization facility are required to comply with FDA QSR, which sets forth minimum 26 Table of Contents standards for the procedures, execution and documentation of the design, testing, production, control, quality assurance, labeling, packaging, sterilization, storage and shipping of the products we sell. FDA may evaluate our compliance with the QSR, among other ways, through periodic announced or unannounced inspections which could disrupt our operations and interrupt our manufacturing. If in conducting an inspection of our manufacturing facilities or the manufacturing facilities of any of our third party comp1nt manufacturers, critical suppliers or third party sterilization facilities, an FDA investigator observes conditions or practices believed to violate the QSR, the investigator may document their observations on a Form FDA 483 that is issued at the conclusion of the inspection. A manufacturer that receives an FDA 483 may respond in writing and explain any corrective actions taken in response to the inspection observations. FDA will typically review the facility written response and may re inspect to determine the facility compliance with the QSR and other applicable regulatory requirements. Failure to take adequate and timely corrective actions to remedy objectionable conditions listed on an FDA 483 could result in FDA taking administrative or enforcement actions. Among these may be FDA issuance of a Warning Letter to a manufacturer, which informs the manufacturer that FDA considers the observed violations to be of regulatory significance that, if not corrected, could result in further enforcement action. FDA enforcement actions, which include seizure, injunction and criminal prosecution, could result in total or partial suspension of a facility production and or distribution, product recalls, fines, suspension of FDA review of product applications and FDA issuance of adverse publicity. Thus, an adverse inspection could force a shutdown of our manufacturing operations or a recall of our products. Adverse inspections could also delay FDA approval of our products and could have an adverse effect on our production, sales and financial condition. We and any of our third party vendors may also encounter other problems during manufacturing including failure to follow specific protocols and procedures, equipment malfunction and environmental factors, any of which could delay or impede our ability to meet demand. The manufacture of our product also subjects us to risks that could harm our business, including problems relating to the sterilization of our products or facilities and errors in manufacturing comp1nts that could negatively affect the efficacy or safety of our products or cause delays in shipment of our products. Any interruption or delay in the manufacture of the product or any of its comp1nts could impair our ability to meet the demand of our customers and cause them to cancel orders or switch to competitive products and could, therefore, have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. We are currently defending against a lawsuit brought under the False Claims Act, and any adverse finding, judgement, or enforcement action could materially and adversely affect our business, financial condition or results of operations. As previously disclosed, on December 11, 2017, the Company received a Civil Investigative Demand (CID) from the USDOJ stating that it was investigating the Company to determine whether the Company has violated the False Claims Act, relating to the promotion of certain medical devices related to the treatment of atrial fibrillation for off label use and submitted or caused to be submitted false claims to certain federal and state health care programs for medically unnecessary healthcare services related to the treatment of Afib. The Company provided the USDOJ with documents and answers to the written interrogatories, and cooperated with the investigation. In 2021, USDOJ informed the Company that the investigation resulted from a lawsuit filed in Western District of North Carolina by a private individual, or "relator," under the federal False Claims Act, and that USDOJ was electing not to intervene in the lawsuit. The relator has indicated that he intends to pursue the lawsuit. The Company sought and obtained a transfer of the case to the Southern District of Ohio, and intends to defend itself vigorously. However, the Company cannot predict when the lawsuit will be resolved, the outcome of the lawsuit or its potential impact on the Company. While the Company believes its practices are lawful, there can be no assurance that the lawsuit will not result in findings of violations of federal laws that could lead to the imposition of damages, fines, penalties, restitution, other m1tary liabilities, sanctions, settlements or changes to the Company business practices or operations that could have a material adverse effect on the Company business, financial condition or results of operations, or eliminate altogether the Company ability to operate its business. The use of products we sell may result in injuries or other adverse events that lead to product liability suits, which could be costly to our business or our customers businesses. The use of our products may result in a variety of serious complications, including damage to the heart, nerves, internal bleeding, death, paralysis or other adverse events. Serious complications are commonly encountered in connection with surgical procedures. If products we sell are defectively designed, manufactured or labeled, contain inadequate warnings, contain defective comp1nts, are misused or are associated with serious injuries or deaths, we may become subject to costly litigation by our customers or their patients. We carry product liability insurance that is limited in scope and amount and may not be adequate to fully protect us against product liability claims. We could be required to pay damages that exceed our insurance coverage, and such amounts could be significant. Any product liability claim, with or without merit, could also result in an increase in our insurance rates or our inability to secure coverage on reasonable terms, 27 Table of Contents if at all. Even in the absence of a claim, our insurance rates may rise in the future. Any product liability claim, even a meritless or unsuccessful 1, would be time consuming and expensive to defend and could result in the diversion of our management attention from our business and result in adverse publicity, withdrawal of clinical trial participants, injury to our reputation and loss of revenue. Any of these events could negatively affect our financial condition. Our intellectual property rights may not provide meaningful commercial protection for our products, which could enable third parties to use our technology or methods, or very similar technology or methods, and could reduce our ability to compete. Our success depends significantly on our ability to protect our proprietary rights to the technologies used in our products. We rely on patent protection, as well as a combination of copyright, trade secret and trademark laws and nondisclosure, confidentiality and other contractual restrictions to protect our proprietary technology. However, these legal means afford only limited protection and may not adequately protect our rights or permit us to gain or keep any competitive advantage. Our patent applications may not issue as patents at all or in a form that will be advantageous to us. Our issued patents and those that may be issued in the future may be challenged, invalidated or circumvented, which could limit our ability to stop competitors from marketing related products. Although we have taken steps to protect our intellectual property and proprietary technology, we cannot assure you that third parties will not be able to design around our patents or, if they do infringe upon our technology, that we will be successful in or will have sufficient resources to pursue a claim of infringement against those third parties. We believe that third parties may have developed or are developing products that could infringe upon our patent rights. Any pursuit of an infringement claim by us may involve substantial expense or diversion of management attention. In addition, although we have generally entered into confidentiality agreements and intellectual property assignment agreements with our employees, consultants, investigators and advisors, such agreements may be breached, may not be enforceable or may not provide meaningful protection for our trade secrets or other proprietary information in the event of unauthorized use or disclosure or other breaches of the agreements. Additionally, as is common in the medical device industry, some of these individuals were previously employed at other medical equipment or biotechnology companies, including our competitors. Although no claims are currently pending against us, we may be subject to claims that these individuals have used or disclosed trade secrets or other proprietary information of their former employers. The laws of foreign countries may not protect our intellectual property rights to the same extent as the laws of the United States. Foreign countries generally do not allow patents to cover methods for performing surgical procedures. If our intellectual property does not provide significant protection against foreign or domestic competition, our competitors could compete more directly with us, which could result in a decrease in our revenue and market share. All of these factors may harm our competitive position. The medical device industry is characterized by extensive litigation and administrative proceedings over patent and other intellectual property rights and any litigation or claim against us may cause us to incur substantial costs, could place a significant strain on our financial resources, divert the attention of management from our business and harm our reputation. Despite measures taken to protect our intellectual property, unauthorized parties might copy aspects of our products or obtain and use information that we regard as proprietary. Whether a product infringes a patent involves complex legal and factual issues, the determination of which is often uncertain. Any patent dispute, even 1 without merit or an unsuccessful 1, would be time consuming and expensive to defend and could result in the diversion of our management attention from our business and result in adverse publicity, the disruption of development and marketing efforts, injury to our reputation and loss of revenue. Litigation also puts our patent applications at risk of being rejected and our patents at risk of being invalidated or interpreted narrowly and may provoke third parties to assert claims against us. Any of these events could negatively affect our financial condition. In the event of a patent dispute, if a third party patents were upheld as valid and enforceable, and we were found to be infringing, or found to be inducing infringement by others, we could be prevented from selling our products unless we were able to obtain a license to use technology or ideas covered by such patent or are able to redesign our system to avoid infringement, or we may be ordered to pay substantial damages to the patent holders. A license may not be available at all or on terms acceptable to us, and we may not be able to redesign our products to avoid any infringement. Modification of our products or development of new products could require us to conduct additional clinical trials and to revise our filings with FDA and other regulatory bodies, which would be time consuming and expensive. If we are not successful in obtaining a license or redesigning our products, we may be unable to sell our products and our business could suffer. 28 Table of Contents We sell our products outside of the United States, and we are subject to various regulatory and other risks relating to international operations, which could harm our revenue and profitability. Doing business outside of the United States exposes us to risks distinct from those we face in our domestic operations. For example, our operations outside of the United States are subject to different regulatory requirements in each jurisdiction where we operate or have sales. Our failure, or the failure of our distributors, to comply with current or future foreign regulatory requirements, or the assertion by foreign authorities that we or our distributors have failed to comply, could result in adverse consequences, including enforcement actions, fines and penalties, recalls, cessation of sales, civil and criminal prosecution, and the consequences could be disproportionate to the relative contribution of our international operations to our results of operations. Moreover, if political or economic conditions deteriorate in these countries, or if any of these countries are affected by a natural disaster or other catastrophe, our ability to conduct our international operations or collect on international accounts receivable could be limited and our costs could be increased, which could negatively affect our operating results. Engaging in business outside of the United States inherently involves a number of other difficulties and risks, including, but not limited to export restrictions and controls relating to technology; pricing pressure that we may experience internationally; difficulties in enforcing agreements and collecting receivables through certain foreign legal systems; political and economic instability; consequences arising from natural disasters and other similar catastrophes, such as hurricanes, tornados, earthquakes, floods and tsunamis; potentially adverse tax consequences, tariffs and other trade barriers; the need to hire additional personnel to promote our products outside of the United States; international terrorism and anti American sentiment; fluctuations in exchange rates for future sales denominated in foreign currency, which represent a portion of our sales outside of the United States; and difficulty in obtaining and enforcing intellectual property rights. Our exposure to each of these risks may increase our costs and require significant management attention. We cannot assure you that 1 or more of these factors will not harm our business. Due to the global nature of our business, we may be exposed to liabilities under the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act and various other anti corruption laws, and any allegation or determination that we violated these laws could have a material adverse effect on our business. Our business practices in foreign countries must comply with anti corruption laws, including the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act (FCPA), the UK Anti Bribery Act of 2010 and other U.S. and foreign anti corruption laws, which prohibit companies from engaging in bribery including corruptly or improperly offering, promising, or providing m1y or anything else of value to foreign officials and certain other recipients. In addition, the FCPA imposes certain books, records and accounting control obligations on public companies and other issuers. We operate in parts of the world in which corruption can be common and compliance with anti bribery laws may conflict with local customs and practices. Our global operations face the risk of unauthorized payments or offers being made by employees, consultants, sales agents and other business partners outside of our control or without our authorization. We have a compliance program in place designed to reduce the likelihood of potential violations of the FCPA and other U.S. and foreign anti bribery and anti corruption laws. It is our policy to implement safeguards (including mandatory training) to prohibit these practices by our employees and business partners with respect to our operations. However, irrespective of these safeguards, or as a result of monitoring compliance with such safeguards, it is possible that we or certain other parties may discover or receive information at some point that certain employees, consultants, sales agents, or other business partners may have engaged in corrupt conduct for which we might be held responsible. Violations of the FCPA or other foreign anti corruption laws may result in restatements of, or irregularities in, our financial statements as well as severe criminal or civil sanctions, and we may be subject to other liabilities, which could 29 Table of Contents negatively affect our business, operating results and financial condition. In some cases, companies that violate the FCPA may be debarred by the U.S. government and or lose their U.S. export privileges. Changes in anti corruption laws or enforcement priorities could also result in increased compliance requirements and related costs which could adversely affect our business, financial condition and results of operations. In addition, the U.S. or other governments may seek to hold us liable for successor liability FCPA violations or violations of other anti corruption laws committed by companies in which we invest or that we acquired or will acquire. Compliance with developing European Union medical device regulations may limit our ability to maintain sales of our products in European markets or to introduce new products into European markets. Many foreign countries where we market or may market our products have regulatory bodies and restrictions similar to those of FDA. International sales are subject to foreign government regulation, the requirements of which vary substantially from country to country. The time required to obtain approval by a foreign country may be longer or shorter than that required for FDA clearance and the requirements may differ. In particular, marketing of medical devices in the EU is subject to compliance with the Medical Device Directive 93 92 EEC (MDD). A medical device may be placed on the market within the EU only if it conforms to certain essential requirements and bears the CE Mark. The most fundamental and essential requirement is that a medical device must be designed and manufactured in such a way that it will not compromise the clinical condition or safety of patients, or the safety and health of users and others. In addition, the device must achieve the essential performance intended by the manufacturer and be designed, manufactured and packaged in a suitable manner. In May 2017, the EU adopted a new Medical Device Regulation (EU) 2017 745 (MDR), which repealed and replaced the MDD effective May 26, 2021 The MDR clearly envisages, among other things, stricter controls of medical devices, including strengthening of the conformity assessment procedures, increased expectations with respect to clinical data for devices and pre market regulatory review of high risk devices. The MDR also envisages greater control over notified bodies and their standards, increased transparency, more robust device vigilance requirements and clarification of the rules for clinical investigations. Under transitional provisions, medical devices with notified body certificates issued under the MDD prior to May 26, 2021 may continue to be placed on the market for the remaining validity of the certificate, until May 26, 2024 at the latest. After the expiry of any applicable transitional period, only devices that have been CE marked under the MDR may be placed on the market in the EU. If we fail to comply with the new MDR, we may not be able to continue to sell existing products in the EU or introduce new products for sale in the EU, either of which could materially harm our results of operations and financial condition. Financial Risks Our quarterly financial results are likely to fluctuate significantly because our sales prospects are uncertain. Due to current worldwide economic conditions, natural disasters and other factors discussed in this Risk Factors section which may impact our sales results, our quarterly operating results are difficult to predict and may fluctuate significantly from quarter to quarter or from prior year to current year periods. These fluctuations may also affect our annual operating results and may cause those results to fluctuate unexpectedly from year to year. We have a history of net losses, and we may never become profitable. Even though we reported net income of $ 50,199 in 2021, we have a history of net losses, including, most recently, net losses of $ 48,155 in 2020 and $ 35,194 in 2019. As of December 31, 2021, we had an accumulated deficit of $ 280,153 . Our net losses have resulted principally from costs and expenses relating to sales, training and promotional efforts, research and development, clinical trials, seeking regulatory clearances and approvals and general operating expenses. We expect to continue to incur substantial expenditures and to potentially incur additional operating losses in the future as we further develop and commercialize our products. If sales of our products do not continue to grow as we anticipate, we will not be able to achieve profitability. Our expansion efforts may prove to be more expensive than we currently anticipate, and we may not succeed in increasing our revenue sufficiently to offset these higher expenses. Our losses have had, and are expected to continue to have, an adverse impact on our working capital, total assets and accumulated deficit. Our federal tax net operating loss (NOL) and general business credit carryforwards generated or acquired may expire or will be limited because we experienced an ownership change of more than 50 percent, which could result in greater future income tax expense and adversely impact future cash flows. . Section 382 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 imposes limitations (Section 382 limitation) on a company ability to use net operating loss and general business credit carryforwards if a company experiences a more than 50 percent 30 Table of Contents ownership change over a 3 year testing period. The Company has not utilized any net operating losses that could be subject to an ownership change. Additionally, in connection with acquisitions, certain acquired NOLs are also subject to Section 382 limitation. The Section 382 limitations could limit the availability of our net operating loss and general business credit carryforwards to offset any future taxable income, which may increase our future income tax expense and adversely impact future cash flows. Federal net operating losses generated prior to 2018 are also subject to expiration under current IRS regulations. We have total federal income tax net operating loss carryforwards that began to expire in 2020 and federal and state research and development credit carryforwards that will begin to expire in 2022 We have available federal net operating loss and research and development credit carryforwards, subject to expiration of $336,792 and $11,269 as of December 31, 2021 We also have various state and foreign net operating losses and development credit carryforwards with varying expirations. Governmental authorities may question our intercompany transfer pricing policies or change their laws in a manner that could increase our effective tax rate or otherwise harm our business. As a U.S. company doing business in international markets through subsidiaries, we are subject to foreign tax and intercompany transfer pricing laws, including those relating to the flow of funds between the parent and subsidiaries. If tax authorities challenge our intercompany transfer pricing, our operations may be negatively impacted and our effective tax rate may increase. Tax rates vary from country to country and if regulators determine that our profits in 1 jurisdiction should be increased, we might not be able to fully offset any associated increase in tax expense in the other jurisdiction, which would increase our effective tax rate. Additionally, the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development, or OECD, has issued certain proposed guidelines regarding base erosion and profit sharing including minimum taxation. As these guidelines are formally adopted by the OECD, it is possible that separate taxing jurisdictions may also adopt some form of these guidelines. In such case, we may need to change our approach to intercompany transfer pricing in order to maintain compliance under the new rules. Our effective tax rate may increase or decrease, including changes in minimum taxation, depending on the current location of global operations at the time of the change. Finally, we might not always be in compliance with all applicable customs, exchange control, value added tax and transfer pricing laws despite our efforts to be aware of and to comply with such laws. In such case, we may need to adjust our operating procedures and our business could be adversely affected. If our goodwill becomes impaired, it could materially reduce the value of our assets and reduce our net income or increase our net loss for the year in which the impairment occurs. As of December 31, 2021, we had $ 234,781 in goodwill related to acquisitions, which represents the purchase price we paid in excess of the fair value of the net assets we acquired. The Financial Accounting Standards Board (FASB) Accounting Standards Codification (ASC) 350, Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets requires that goodwill be tested for impairment at least annually (absent any impairment indicators). The testing includes comparing the fair value of each reporting unit with its carrying value. We may have future impairment adjustments to our recorded goodwill. Any finding that the value of our goodwill has been impaired would require us to record an impairment charge which could materially reduce the value of our assets and reduce our net income or increase our net loss for the year in which the impairment charge occurs and increase our accumulated deficit. An inability to forecast future revenue or estimate life cycles of products may result in inventory related charges that would negatively affect our gross margins and results of operations. To mitigate the risk of supply interruptions, we may choose to maintain additional inventory of our products or comp1nt parts. Managing our inventory levels is important to our cash position and results of operations and is challenging in the current economic environment. As we grow and expand our product offerings, managing our inventory levels becomes more difficult, particularly as we expand into new product areas and bring product enhancements to market. While we rely on our personnel and information technology systems for inventory management, our personnel and information technology systems may fail to adequately perform these functions or may experience an interruption. An excessive amount of inventory reduces our cash available for operations and may result in excess or obsolete materials. Conversely, inadequate inventory levels may make it difficult for us to meet customer product demand, resulting in decreased revenue. An inability to forecast future revenue or estimated life cycles of products may result in inventory related charges that would negatively affect our gross margins and results of operations and increase our accumulated deficit. 31 Table of Contents We are subject to credit risk from our accounts receivable related to our sales, which include sales to countries outside the United States that may experience economic turmoil. The majority of our accounts receivable arise from sales in the United States. However, we also have significant receivable balances from customers within the European Union and Asia. Our accounts receivable in the United States are primarily due from public and private hospitals. Our accounts receivable outside the United States are primarily due from public and private hospitals and from independent distributors. Our historical write offs of accounts receivable have not been significant. We monitor the financial performance and credit worthiness of our customers so that we can properly assess and respond to changes in their credit profile. Our independent distributors operate in certain countries where economic conditions continue to present challenges to their businesses, and, thus, could place the amounts due to us at risk. These distributors are owed amounts from public hospitals that are funded by their governments. Adverse financial conditions in these countries may negatively affect the length of time that it will take us to collect associated accounts receivable or impact the likelihood of ultimate collection. We may be unable to comply with the covenants of our Loan Agreement. Our Loan Agreement with Silicon Valley Bank ( SVB ) contains a minimum liquidity covenant, dividend restrictions and other customary terms and conditions. The occurrence of an event of default could result in an increase to the applicable interest rate by 30%, an acceleration of all obligations, an obligation to repay all obligations in full and a right by SVB to exercise all remedies available to them. If we are unable to pay those amounts, SVB could proceed against the collateral granted to it pursuant to the Loan Agreement, and we may in turn lose access to our current source of borrowing availability. Common Stock Risks We may fail to meet our publicly announced guidance or other expectations about our business and future operating results, which could cause a decline in our stock price. We provide financial guidance about our business and future operating results. In developing this guidance, our management makes certain assumptions and judgments about our future operating performance, including projected hiring of sales professionals, continued increase of our market share and continued stability of the macro economic environment in our key markets. Furthermore, analysts and investors may develop and publish their own projections of our business, which may form a consensus about our future performance. Our business results may vary significantly from such guidance or that consensus due to a number of factors, many of which are outside of our control, and which could adversely affect our operations and operating results. Furthermore, if we make downward revisions of our previously announced guidance, or if our publicly announced guidance of future operating results fails to meet expectations of securities analysts, investors, or other interested parties, the market price of our common stock could decline. Securities analysts may not continue, or additional securities analysts may not initiate, coverage for our common stock or may issue negative reports. This may have a negative impact on the market price of our common stock. Several securities analysts provide research coverage of our common stock. Some analysts have already published statements that do not portray our technology, products or procedures using our products in a positive light and others may do so in the future. If we are unable to educate those who publicize such reports about the benefits we believe our business provides, or if 1 or more of the analysts who elects to cover us downgrades our stock, our stock price would likely decline rapidly. If 1 or more of these analysts ceases coverage of our company, we could lose visibility in the market, which in turn could cause our stock price to decline. The trading market for our common stock may be affected in part by the research and reports that industry or financial analysts publish about us or our business. If sufficient securities analysts do not cover our common stock, the lack of research coverage may adversely affect the market price of our common stock. It may be difficult for companies such as ours, with a smaller market capitalization, to attract and maintain sufficient independent financial analysts that will cover our common stock. This could have a negative effect on the market price of our stock. The price and trading volume of our common stock may experience extreme fluctuations and our stockholders could lose some or all of their investment. Because we operate within the medical device segment of the healthcare industry, our stock price is likely to be volatile. The market price of our common stock may have and has had a history of substantial fluctuation due to a variety of factors, including, but not limited to those risk factors described in the Risk Factors section herein. These factors, some of which are not within our control, may cause the price of our stock to fluctuate substantially. We believe the 32 Table of Contents quarterly and annual comparisons of our financial results are not necessarily meaningful and should not be relied upon as an indication of our future performance. The market prices of the securities of medical device companies, particularly companies like ours without consistent revenue and earnings, have been highly volatile and are likely to remain highly volatile in the future. This volatility has often been unrelated to the operating performance of these particular companies. In the past, companies that experience volatility in the market price of their securities have often faced securities class action litigation. Whether or not meritorious, litigation brought against us could result in substantial costs, divert our management attention and resources and harm our ability to grow our business. The sale of material amounts of common stock could encourage short sales by third parties and depress the price of our common stock. As a result, our stockholders may lose all or part of their investment. The downward pressure on our stock price caused by the sale of a significant number of shares of our common stock or the perception that such sales could occur by any of our significant stockholders could cause our stock price to decline, thus allowing short sellers of our stock an opportunity to take advantage of any decrease in the value of our stock. The presence of short sellers in our common stock may further depress the price of our common stock. Some of our directors and executive officers have entered into, or may enter into, Rule 10b5 1 trading plans pursuant to which they may sell shares of our stock from time to time in the future. Actual or potential sales by these insiders, including those under a prearranged Rule 10b5 1 trading plan, could be interpreted by the market as an indication that the insider has lost confidence in our stock and adversely impact the market price of our stock. Sales of common stock by us in a capital raising transaction or our issuances of shares in an acquisition may dilute stockholder ownership of common stock and cause a decline in the market price of our common stock. We may need to raise capital in the future to fund our operations or new initiatives or reduce or pay in full our indebtedness. If we raise funds by issuing equity securities, our stock price may decline and our existing stockholders may experience significant dilution. Furthermore, we may enter into capital raising transactions or issue shares in acquisitions at prices that represent a substantial discount to market price. A negative reaction by investors and securities analysts to any sale of our equity securities could result in a decline in the trading price of our common stock. Anti takeover provisions in our amended and restated certificate of incorporation and amended and restated bylaws and under Delaware law could inhibit a change in control or a change in management that stockholders consider favorable. Provisions in our certificate of incorporation and bylaws could delay or prevent a change of control or change in management that would provide a premium to the market price of common stock. These provisions include those authorizing the issuance without further approval of blank check preferred stock that could be issued by our board of directors to increase the number of outstanding shares and thwart a takeover attempt; prohibiting cumulative voting in the election of directors, which would otherwise allow less than a majority of stockholders to elect director candidates; limiting the ability of stockholders to call special meetings of stockholders; prohibiting stockholder action by written consent, thereby requiring all stockholder actions to be taken at a meeting of stockholders; and establishing advance notice requirements for nominations for election to the board of directors or for proposing matters that can be acted upon by stockholders at stockholder meetings. In addition, Section 203 of the Delaware General Corporation Law limits business combination transactions with 15% stockholders that have not been approved by our board of directors. These provisions and others could make it difficult for a third party to acquire us, or for members of our board of directors to be replaced, even if doing so would be beneficial to our stockholders. Because our board of directors is responsible for appointing the members of our management team, these provisions could, in turn, affect any attempt to replace the current management team. If a change of control or change in management is delayed or prevented, stockholders may lose an opportunity to realize a premium on shares of common stock or the market price of our common stock could decline. 33 Table of Contents We do not expect to pay dividends in the foreseeable future. As a result, stockholders must rely on stock appreciation for any return on investment. We do not anticipate paying cash dividends on our common stock in the foreseeable future. Any payment of cash dividends will also depend on our financial condition, results of operations, capital requirements and other factors and will be at the discretion of our board of directors. Accordingly, stockholders will have to rely on capital appreciation, if any, to earn a return on investment in our common stock. Furthermore, pursuant to our credit facility, we are currently subject to restrictions on our ability to pay dividends and we may in the future become subject to other contractual restrictions on, or prohibitions against, the payment of dividends. ITEM 1B. UNRESOLVED STAFF COMMENTS N1 ITEM 2 PROPERTIES 
